And if she asks you why you can tell her that I told you 
 That I'm tired of Castles in the Air 
 I've got a dream I want the world to share 
 And castle walls just lead me to despair 
 Hills of forest green where the mountains touch the sky 
 A dream come true, I'll live there till I die 
 I'm asking you, to say my last goodbye 
 The love we knew ain't worth another try 
 Save me from all the trouble and the pain 
 I know I'm weak but I can't face that girl again 
 Tell her the reasons why I can't remain 
 Perhaps she'll understand if you tell it to her plain 
 Oh, but how can words express the feel of sunlight 
 In the morning in the hills away from city strife 
 I need a country woman for my wife 
 I'm city born but I love the country life 
 For I will not be part of the Cocktail-Generation 
 Partner's Waltz, devoid of all romance 
 The music plays and everyone must dance 
 I'm bowing out, I need a second chance 
 Save me from all the trouble and the pain 
 I know I'm weak but I can't face that girl again 
 Tell her the reasons why I can't remain 
 Perhaps she'll understand if you tell it to her plain 
 And if she asks you why you can tell her that I told you 
 That I'm tired of Castles in the Air 
 I've got a dream I want the world to share 
 And castle walls just lead me to despairAnd if she asks you why, you can tell her that I told you 
 That I'm tired of castles in the air 
 I've got a dream I want the world to share 
 And castle walls just lead me to despair 
 Hills of forest green where the mountains touch the sky 
 Dream come true, I'll live there till I die 
 I'm asking you to say my last goodbye 
 The love we knew ain't worth another try 
 Save me from all the trouble and the pain 
 I know I'm weak but I can't face that girl again 
 Tell her the reasons why I can't remain 
 Perhaps she'll understand if you tell it to her plain 
 But how can words express the feel of sunlight in the morning 
 In the hills, away from city strife? 
 I need a country woman for my wife 
 I'm city born but I love the country life 
 For I will not be part of her cocktail generation 
 Partners waltz, devoid of all romance 
 The music plays and everyone must dance 
 I'm bowing out, I need a second chance 
 Save me from all the trouble and the pain 
 I know I'm weak but I can't face that girl again 
 Tell her the reasons why I can't remain 
 Perhaps she'll understand if you tell it to her plain 
 And if she asks you why, you can tell her that I told you 
 That I'm tired of castles in the air 
 I've got a dream I want the world to share 
 And castle walls just lead me to despairOut in the West Texas town of El Paso 
 I fell in love with a Mexican girl. 
 Night-time would find me in Rosa's cantina; 
 Music would play and Felina would whirl. 
 Blacker than night were the eyes of Felina, 
 Wicked and evil while casting a spell. 
 My love was deep for this Mexican maiden; 
 I was in love but in vain, I could tell. 
 One night a wild young cowboy came in, 
 Wild as the West Texas wind. 
 Dashing and daring, 
 A drink he was sharing 
 With wicked Felina, 
 The girl that I loved. 
 So in anger I 
 Challenged his right for the love of this maiden. 
 Down went his hand for the gun that he wore. 
 My challenge was answered in less than a heart-beat; 
 The handsome young stranger lay dead on the floor. 
 Just for a moment I stood there in silence, 
 Shocked by the FOUL EVIL deed I had done. 
 Many thoughts raced through my mind as I stood there; 
 I had but one chance and that was to run. 
 Out through the back door of Rosa's I ran, 
 Out where the horses were tied. 
 I caught a good one. 
 It looked like it could run. 
 Up on its back 
 And away I did ride, 
 Just as fast as I 
 Could from the West Texas town of El Paso 
 Out to the bad-lands of New Mexico. 
 Back in El Paso my life would be worthless. 
 Everything's gone in life; nothing is left. 
 It's been so long since I've seen the young maiden 
 My love is stronger than my fear of death. 
 I saddled up and away I did go, 
 Riding alone in the dark. 
 Maybe tomorrow 
 A bullet may find me. 
 Tonight nothing's worse than this 
 Pain in my heart. 
 And at last here I 
 Am on the hill overlooking El Paso; 
 I can see Rosa's cantina below. 
 My love is strong and it pushes me onward. 
 Down off the hill to Felina I go. 
 Off to my right I see five mounted cowboys; 
 Off to my left ride a dozen or more. 
 Shouting and shooting I can't let them catch me. 
 I have to make it to Rosa's back door. 
 Something is dreadfully wrong for I feel 
 A deep burning pain in my side. 
 Though I am trying 
 To stay in the saddle, 
 I'm getting weary, 
 Unable to ride. 
 But my love for 
 Felina is strong and I rise where I've fallen, 
 Though I am weary I can't stop to rest. 
 I see the white puff of smoke from the rifle. 
 I feel the bullet go deep in my chest. 
 From out of nowhere Felina has found me, 
 Kissing my cheek as she kneels by my side. 
 Cradled by two loving arms that I'll die for, 
 One little kiss and Felina, good-bye.There is no time to discuss or debate 
 What is right, what is wrong for our people. 
 Time has run out for all those who wait 
 With bent limbs and minds that are feeble. 
 And the rain falls and blows through their window 
 And the snow falls and blows through their door. 
 And the seasons revolve mid their sounds of starvation. 
 When the tides rise, they cover the floor. 
 They come from the north and they come from the south 
 And they come from the hills and the valleys. 
 And they're migrants and farmers and miners and humans, 
 Our census neglected to tally. 
 And the rain falls and blows through their window 
 And the snow falls and it blows through their door. 
 And the seasons revolve mid their sounds of starvation. 
 When the tides rise, they cover the floor. 
 And they're African, Mexican, Caucasian, Indian, 
 Hungry and hopeless Americans. 
 The orphans of wealth and of adequate health, 
 Disowned by this nation they live in. 
 And with weather worn hands on bread lines they stand, 
 Yet but one more degradation. 
 Yes, and they're treated like tramps while we sell them food stamps 
 This thriving and prosperous nation. 
 And the rain falls and blows through their window 
 And the snow falls and blows through their door. 
 And the seasons revolve mid their sounds of starvation. 
 When the tides rise, they cover the floor. 
 And with roaches and rickets and rats in the thickets, 
 Infested, diseased and decaying. 
 With rags and no shoes and skin sores that ooze, 
 By the poisonous pools, they are playing. 
 In shacks of two rooms that are rotting wood tombs 
 With corpses breathing inside them. 
 Oh yes and we pity their plight as they call in the night 
 And we do all that we can do to hide them. 
 And the rain falls and blows through their window 
 And the snow falls in white drifts that fold 
 And the tides rise with floods in the nursery. 
 And a child is crying, he's hungry and cold, 
 His life has been sold, his young face looks old. 
 It's the face of America, dying.I'm an old cowhand from the Rio Grande 
 But my legs ain't bowed and my cheeks ain't tan 
 I'm a cowboy who never saw a cow 
 Never roped a steer 'cause I don't know how 
 Sure ain't a fixin to start in now 
 Yippie yi yo kayah 
 I'm an old cowhand and I come down from the Rio Grande 
 And I learned to ride, ride, ride 'fore I learned to stand 
 I'm a riding fool who is up to date 
 I know every trail in the Lone Star State 
 'Cause I ride the range in a Ford V-8 
 Yippie yi yo kayah 
 We're old cowhands from the Rio Grande 
 And we come to town just to hear the band 
 We know all the songs that the cowboys know 
 'Bbout the big corral where the doggies go 
 We learned them all on the radio 
 Yippie yi yo kayah 
 I'm an old cowhand 
 Oh yes, Mr. Bing. 
 Too hot for you, Uncle Fudd? 
 Down from the Rio Grande 
 Oh where the west is wild all around the borderland 
 Where the buffalo roam around the zoo 
 And the Injuns run up a rug or two 
 And the old Bar X is just a barbecue, yeah 
 Yippie yi yo kayah 
 I'm a pioneer who began from scratch 
 I don't bat an eye in a shootin' match. 
 They don't call me Elmer, they call me Satch. 
 Yippie yi yo kayah 
 Yippie yi yo kayah 
 Get along little horsy 
 Get along little horsy 
 Yippie yi yo kayah, oh!What will the world be like when you're on your own? 
 What will the world be like when you're almost grown? 
 What will the world be like when you pack your things, 
 When you leave your home? 
 What in the world will tomorrow bring? 
 Will you be safe in the sweet arms of love? 
 Will you be true to yourself and the things you believe? 
 What will the world be like when you need a friend? 
 What will the world be like when you're on the mend? 
 What will the world be like when you go astray, 
 And you slip and fall? 
 How in the world will you find your way? 
 Will you find peace and forgiveness and joy? 
 Will you have children yourself, and be worried like me? 
 What will the world be like when you're on your own? 
 What will the world be like when you're almost grown? 
 What will the world be like when you pack your things, 
 When you leave your home? 
 What in the world will tomorrow bring? 
 What will the world be like?If you could read my mind, love, 
 What a tale my thoughts could tell. 
 Just like an old time movie, 
 'Bout a ghost from a wishing well. 
 In a castle dark or a fortress strong, 
 With chains upon my feet. 
 You know that ghost is me. 
 And I will never be set free 
 As long as I'm a ghost that you can't see. 
 If I could read your mind, love, 
 What a tale your thoughts could tell. 
 Just like a paperback novel, 
 The kind the drugstores sell. 
 When you reached the part 
 Where the heartaches come, 
 The hero would be me. 
 But heroes often fail, 
 And you won't read that book again 
 Because the ending's just too hard to take! 
 I'd walk away like a movie star 
 Who gets burned in a three way script. 
 Enter number two: 
 A movie queen to play the scene 
 Of bringing all the good things out in me. 
 But for now, love, let's be real; 
 I never thought I could act this way 
 And I've got to say that I just don't get it. 
 I don't know where we went wrong, 
 But the feeling's gone 
 And I just can't get it back. 
 If you could read my mind, love, 
 What a tale my thoughts could tell. 
 Just like an old time movie, 
 'Bout a ghost from a wishing well. 
 In a castle dark or a fortress strong. 
 With chains upon my feet. 
 But stories always end, 
 And if you read between the lines, 
 You'll know that I'm just tryin' to understand 
 The feelin's that you lack. 
 I never thought I could feel this way 
 And I've got to say that I just don't get it. 
 I don't know where we went wrong, 
 But the feelin's gone 
 And I just can't get it backI am a man who traveled everywhere 
 Holding mirages made of hair 
 Mansions of silver, women of gold 
 Well, all I had was the tale I told 
 I've been a wanderer, I can let go 
 But you would do better to stay 
 Don't burn the bridge that brought you over 
 Or you'll be traveling all your days 
 I had no family, I had no real friends 
 I had a lover who more then just pretends 
 She played a mind game, I played it too 
 When you're in love, those are the things you do 
 I've been a loser, I've won the game 
 I've had power, fortune, and fame 
 Don't burn the bridge that brought you over 
 For you're a poor man, just the same 
 Poor man, poor man 
 Yes, I'll admit I've burned my bridges one and all 
 That I have turned my back on some who tried to see me fall 
 And then you came and built a bridge 
 Where once there was a wall in my life 
 I can cross over, live on the other side 
 I was a rover, until I met my bride 
 She has the magic, I have the dreams 
 With her, my life is really all it seems 
 There's no illusion, this is for real 
 And I'm so satisfied, deep within 
 You are the bridge that brought me over 
 And you are everywhere I've ever been 
 Your man, I'm your man 
 Yes, I'll admit I've burned my bridges one and all 
 That I have turned my back on some who tried to see me fall 
 And then you came to build a bridge 
 Where once there was a wall 
 Came and built a bridge 
 Where there was a wall 
 Came and built a bridge 
 Where there was a wall 
 In my life, in my lifeI was walking by the graveyard, late last Friday night, 
 I heard somebody yelling, it sounded like a fight. 
 It was just a drunken hobo dancing circles in the night, 
 Pouring whiskey on the headstones in the blue moonlight. 
 So often have I wondered where these homeless brothers go, 
 Down in some hidden valley were their sorrows cannot show, 
 Where the police cannot find them, where the wanted men can go. 
 There's freedom when your walking, even though you're walking slow. 
 Smash your bottle on a gravestone and live while you can, 
 That homeless brother is my friend. 
 It's hard to be a pack rat, it's hard to be a 'bo, 
 But living's so much harder where the heartless people go. 
 Somewhere the dogs are barking and the children seem to know 
 That Jesus on the highway was a lost hobo. 
 And they hear the holy silence of the temples in the hill, 
 And they see the ragged tatters as another kind of thrill. 
 And they envy him the sunshine and they pity him the chill, 
 And they're sad to do their living for some other kind of thrill. 
 Smash your bottle on a gravestone and live while you can, 
 That homeless brother is my friend. 
 Somewhere there was a woman, somewhere there was a child, 
 Somewhere there was a cottage where the marigolds grew wild. 
 But some where's just like nowhere when you leave it for a while, 
 You'll find the broken-hearted when you're travelling jungle-style. 
 Down the bowels of a broken land where numbers live like men, 
 Where those who keep their senses have them taken back again, 
 Where the night stick cracks with crazy rage, where madmen don't 
 Pretend, 
 Where wealth has no beginning and poverty no end. 
 Smash your bottle on a gravestone and live while you can, 
 That homeless brother is my friend. 
 The ghosts of highway royalty have vanished in the night, 
 The Whitman wanderer walking toward a glowing inner light. 
 The children have grown older and the cops have gripped us tight, 
 There's no spot round the melting pot for free men in their flight. 
 And you who leave on promises and prosper as you please, 
 The victim of your riches often dies of your disease, 
 He can't hear the factory whistle, just the lonesome freight train's 
 Wheeze, 
 He's living on good fortune, he ain't dying on his knees. 
 Smash your bottle on a gravestone and live while you can, 
 That homeless brother is my friend. 
 That homeless brother is my friend.Love me tender, love me sweet 
 Never let me go 
 You have made my life complete 
 And I love you so 
 Love me tender, love me true 
 All my dreams fulfill 
 For my darling I love you 
 And I always will 
 Love me tender, love me long 
 Take me to your heart 
 For it's there that I belong 
 And we'll never part 
 Love me tender, love me dear 
 Tell me you are mine 
 I'll be yours through all the years 
 Till the end of time 
 When at last my dreams come true 
 Darling this I know 
 Happiness will follow you 
 Everywhere you go 
 Love me tender, love me true 
 All my dreams fulfill 
 For my darling I love you 
 And I always will 
 Yes, my darling I love you 
 And I always will 
 (Love me tender)Come you masters of war 
 You that build all the guns 
 You that build the death planes 
 You that build all the bombs 
 You that hide behind walls 
 You that hide behind desks 
 I just want you to know 
 I can see through your masks. 
 You that never done nothin' 
 But build to destroy 
 You play with my world 
 Like it's your little toy 
 You put a gun in my hand 
 And you hide from my eyes 
 And you turn and run farther 
 When the fast bullets fly. 
 Like Judas of old 
 You lie and deceive 
 A world war can be won 
 You want me to believe 
 But I see through your eyes 
 And I see through your brain 
 Like I see through the water 
 That runs down my drain. 
 You fasten all the triggers 
 For the others to fire 
 Then you set back and watch 
 When the death count gets higher 
 You hide in your mansion' 
 As young people's blood 
 Flows out of their bodies 
 And is buried in the mud. 
 You've thrown the worst fear 
 That can ever be hurled 
 Fear to bring children 
 Into the world 
 For threatening my baby 
 Unborn and unnamed 
 You ain't worth the blood 
 That runs in your veins. 
 How much do I know 
 To talk out of turn 
 You might say that I'm young 
 You might say I'm unlearned 
 But there's one thing I know 
 Though I'm younger than you 
 That even Jesus would never 
 Forgive what you do. 
 Let me ask you one question 
 Is your money that good 
 Will it buy you forgiveness 
 Do you think that it could 
 I think you will find 
 When your death takes its toll 
 All the money you made 
 Will never buy back your soul. 
 And I hope that you die 
 And your death'll come soon 
 I will follow your casket 
 In the pale afternoon 
 And I'll watch while you're lowered 
 Down to your deathbed 
 And I'll stand over your grave 
 'Til I'm sure that you're deadYou make me 
 Think I'm listenin' to a symphony, 
 You make me 
 Hear the beauty of your poetry! 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words, 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words. 
 You make me 
 Hear the lyric in the harmony, 
 You make me 
 Hear the chorus in the melody! 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words, 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words. 
 I see your face, 
 And when you walk my way, 
 The violins 
 Always start to play, 
 And when you talk, 
 I don't care what you say, 
 It comes out I love you so, 
 Anyway, you should know 
 You make me 
 Think I'm listenin' to a symphony, 
 You make me 
 Hear the beauty of your poetry! 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words, 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words. 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words, 
 You got a good way with music, baby, 
 Got a good way with words.Maybe, baby, I'll have you 
 Maybe, baby, you'll be true 
 Maybe, baby, I'll have you for me 
 It's funny, honey, you don't care 
 You never listen to my prayer 
 Maybe, baby, you will love me someday 
 Well, you are the one that makes me glad 
 And you are the one that makes me sad 
 And when some day you want me 
 Well, I'll be there, wait and see 
 Maybe, baby, I'll have you 
 Maybe, baby, you'll be true 
 Maybe, baby, I'll have you for me 
 Well, you are the one that makes me glad 
 And you are the one that makes me sad 
 And when some day you want me 
 Well, I'll be there, wait and see 
 Maybe, baby, I'll have you 
 Maybe, baby, you'll be true 
 Maybe, baby, I'll have you for me 
 Maybe, baby, I'll have you for meAh, it ain't so easy is it? You almost lost your place 
 And perhaps you're wondering how you're going to cope with your disgrace 
 Well your wealth is well established and your friends were never few 
 And all the things they told you of your finding to be true 
 Well if truth can free the guilty while the innocent must die 
 Then I respect, respect, respect the coldest lie 
 And you talk of human justice while you drive on fancy wheels 
 And you push them to their limit just to see how nice it feels 
 Well it doesn't really matter if she's living or she's dead 
 You just drive away forgetting that your bumper's dipped in red 
 Well if that's the kind of justice that our hall of justice claims 
 Then I respect, respect, respect old Jesse James 
 And most cordially they caught you and they asked you to obey 
 And they threw you into prison, just in case you could not pay 
 Well King Arthur jousted Lancelot, who stole away his wife 
 And your lawyers jousted with the court to save your precious life 
 Well if living is what matters though you lie with every breath 
 Then I respect, respect, the ones we put to death 
 And you won your case most easily and soon you will be free 
 But there will be a million more who lose their liberty 
 Not because of what they did, but what they did not do 
 They did not pay a lawyer or a judge to see them through 
 Why, they had no friends to call on and they could not raise their bail 
 Well if the winning is what matters, I respect the ones who failIt's just the sun that's shinin' in your eyes. 
 It's just the moon that is the sun's disguise. 
 Just the sky, with clouds a blowin' by. 
 The sun and the moon and the sky, and you and I. 
 It's just the rain that's rollin' down my cheek. 
 It's just the wind that makes me hear you speak. 
 It's just the song that anyone can sing. 
 The rain and the wind and the song and the love you bring. 
 It's just the world that gonna break your heart. 
 It's just the past that's tearin' us apart. 
 It's just the time we have so little of. 
 The world and the past and the time that we fell in love. 
 It's just the sun that's shinin' in your eyes 
 It's just the moon that is the sun's disguise 
 It's just the sky, with clouds a blowin' by 
 The sun and the moon and the sky, and you and I.I find you in my arms, this is how it begins 
 And we are so close, like Siamese twins. 
 Though you're separate from me, and we're often apart 
 Still nobody can see, that we're joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 You don't look like me it's true and I don't look like you 
 As we lead separate lives our secret still survives 
 Only we know our special affection, 
 Only we know our secret connection. 
 Now you're back in my arms, at the end of the day 
 And like Siamese twins, with each other we'll stay. 
 Though you're separate from me, and we're often apart 
 Still nobody can see, that we're joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Still nobody can see, that we're joined at the heart.And now the purple dusk of twilight time 
 Steals across the meadows of my heart 
 High up in the sky the little stars climb 
 Always reminding me that we're apart 
 You wander down the lane and far away 
 Leaving me a song that will not die 
 Love is now the stardust of yesterday 
 The music of the years gone by. 
 Sometimes I wonder, how I spend 
 The lonely nights 
 Dreaming of a song 
 The melody 
 Haunts my reverie 
 And I am once again with you 
 When our love was new 
 And each kiss an inspiration 
 But that was long ago 
 And now my consolation is in the stardust of a song 
 Besides the garden wall, when stars are bright 
 You are in my arms 
 The nightingale 
 Tells his fairytale 
 Of paradise, where roses grew 
 Though I dream in vain 
 In my heart it will remain 
 My stardust melody 
 The memory of love's refrainHave you seen me I just might be your little baby? 
 Have you seen me I'm lookin' at you with grown up eyes? 
 Every milk carton and highway billboard sign says maybe. 
 Have you seen me or have you only seen my disguise? 
 I had a fight with mama and she said she couldn't stand me. 
 I had a fight with papa and he really likes to swing his fist. 
 I'm sick and tired of all those stupid rules they hand me. 
 They try to make me feel I have no right to exist. 
 Have you seen me, well I've seen you. 
 I've seen what the grown ups do. 
 I've seen I can do that too. 
 Have you seen me? 
 Well I'm older now than I was the day I vanished. 
 You might not even know me if you saw me passin' by. 
 Others take your place in the dark world of the banished. 
 On vicious streets where no one hears me cry. 
 Well you can't run, you can't hide 
 Turn your face, walk inside. 
 Can't close your doors, because I'm yours. 
 Have you seen me? 
 Well I'm fighting in Nicaragua, I'm fighting in Afghanistan. 
 In Israel I wear a gun, in Palestine a rock is in my hand. 
 In Africa you see me starve, in America they just throw me away. 
 But I'm making history that other kids will read about some day 
 Have you seen me, well I've seen you. 
 I've seen what the grown ups do. 
 I've seen I can do that too. 
 Have you seen me? 
 Have you seen me? 
 Have you seen me? 
 Have you seen me?Love is funny or it's sad, 
 Or it's quiet or it's mad, 
 It's a good thing or it's bad, 
 But beautiful! 
 Beautiful to take a chance 
 And if you fall, you fall, 
 And I'm thinking I wouldn't mind at all. 
 Love is tearful or it's gay. 
 It's a problem or it's play, 
 It's a heartache either way, 
 But beautiful! 
 And I'm thinking if you were mine 
 I'd never let you go, 
 And that would be but beautiful I knowBorn in the heat of the desert 
 My mother died giving me life 
 Deprived of the love of a father 
 Blamed for the loss of his wife 
 You know Lord I've been in a prison 
 For something that I never done 
 It's been one hill after another 
 I've climbed them all one by one 
 But this time, Lord you gave me a mountain 
 A mountain you know I may never climb 
 It isn't just a hill any longer 
 You gave me a mountain this time 
 My woman got tired of heartaches 
 Tired of the grief and the strife 
 So tired of working for nothing 
 Just tired of being my wife 
 She took my one ray of sunshine 
 She took my pride and my joy 
 She took my reason for living 
 She took my small baby boy 
 But this time, Lord you gave me a mountain 
 A mountain you know I may never climb 
 It isn't just a hill any longer 
 You gave me a mountain this timeCotton candy, two for a quarter 
 See if the fat man can guess your weight 
 A big stuffed tiger is what I bought her 
 And I'm going home 'cause it's late 
 Roller coasters make me dizzy 
 And cotton candy makes me sick 
 I wish I had some Bromo fizzy 
 Now that would do the trick 
 Everyone knows that the clowns aren't happy 
 And everyone knows that the people don't care 
 I wish I could laugh at the way that they're acting 
 But I'm so sick, I just don't dare to 
 High wire dancers kick and balance 
 White silk horses step in time 
 The tattooed man displays his talents 
 I'm not the talented kind 
 I always go to the circus on Sunday 
 And there I can laugh at the people I see 
 But when I leave home in the morning on Monday 
 Everybody laughs at me 
 I make other people nervous 
 I guess that's why they laugh at me 
 But to me my life is a three-ring circus 
 And I can see it for free 
 Have you seen my wife Elvira? 
 She can tame a lion, you know 
 Well, I once had a bushy mane 
 But that was so damn long ago 
 Tight-collared clowns in plastic buildings 
 Have happy families as their fate 
 Happy jobs and happy clubs 
 And happy people they hate 
 Everyone's juggling and everyone's acting 
 With smiles of grease paint three feet wide 
 Everyone's caught on a carousel pony 
 And one time around is a lifetime rideWhen I'm worried and I can't sleep 
 I count my blessings instead of sheep 
 And I fall asleep counting my blessings 
 When my bankroll is getting small 
 I think of when I had none at all 
 And I fall asleep counting my blessings 
 I think about a nursery and I picture curly heads 
 And one by one I count them as they slumber in their beds 
 If you're worried and you can't sleep 
 Just count your blessings instead of sheep 
 And you'll fall asleep counting your blessings 
 I think about a nursery and I picture curly heads 
 And one by one I count them as they slumber in their beds 
 If you're worried and you can't sleep 
 Just count your blessings instead of sheep 
 And you'll fall asleep counting your blessingsThe spirit of Fatima still rules the earth, 
 She knows your future; she knows what its worth, 
 Sister Fatima has god-given powers, 
 On 42nd street in a shop that sells flowers, 
 Is her palace, 
 Come and be healed. 
 She knows all your business, your health and your ills, 
 She'll counsel your weddings, divorces, and wills, 
 For full restoration, five dollars an hour, 
 With each consultation, a free holy flower. 
 If she likes you, why, you can have two. 
 And I came from nowhere, like you and your friend, 
 My searching and wandering went on without end, 
 My future was dim, my spirit was crushed, 
 In one sacred moment, my questions were hushed. 
 I'm a servant of fate in this garden of truth, 
 A humble recruit of the taffeta booth 
 Where all things are known, but few are revealed. 
 Where sins are forgotten, and sickness is healed, 
 For five dollars. 
 The flower is free.The pattern is broken, the pieces don't fit. 
 Pull them apart and move them a bit. 
 See what you've made and see who you are. 
 The plans that you've laid can go just so far. 
 Before the pattern get's broken, the pieces don't fit. 
 Pull them apart and move them a bit. 
 See what you've made and see who you are. 
 The plans that you've laid can go just so far. 
 Then it's the end of sunny weather. 
 When all the pieces fit together. 
 And it looks like the final ending. 
 But it's really the beginning. 
 And though the pieces are apart now. 
 And you got a broken heart now. 
 Someday the sun is gonna shine on a fabulous design, 
 That only you can see. Ah. 
 But then the pattern get's broken, the pieces don't fit. 
 Pull them apart and move them a bit. 
 See what you've made and see who you are. 
 The plans that you've laid can go just so far. 
 Before the pattern get's broken, the pieces don't fit. 
 (The pattern's broken and the pieces don't fit) 
 Pull them apart and move them a bit. 
 (Pull them apart and then move them a bit) 
 See what you've made and see who you are. 
 (See what you've made and see who you are) 
 The plans that you've laid can go just so far. 
 (The plans you've laid will only go just so far) 
 Before the pattern get's broken, the pieces don't fit. 
 (The pattern's broken and the pieces don't fit) 
 Pull them apart and move them a bit. 
 (Pull them apart and then move them a bit) 
 See what you've made and see who you are. 
 (See what you've made and see who you are) 
 The plans that you've laid can go just so far. 
 (The plans you've laid will only go just so far) 
 Ah, ahaha, ah, ahaha, ah, ahhha...Well, that's all right, mama 
 That's all right with you 
 That's all right, mama 
 Do me anyway you do 
 That's all right, that's all right 
 Yeah, that's all right now, mama 
 Anyway you do 
 Well, I'm leaving town this morning 
 Yes, I'm leaving town for sure 
 And then you won't be bothered 
 With me hanging 'round your door 
 And that's all right, yeah, that's all right 
 Yeah, that's all right now, mama 
 Anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, mama 
 That's all right with you 
 That's all right, mama 
 Do me anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, that's all right 
 Yeah, that's all right now, mama 
 Anyway you do 
 Oh, mama, mama, mama, she done told me 
 And my papa, papa told me too 
 She said "The woman that you been mesin' with 
 Will be the death of you" 
 Well, that's all right, yes, that's all right 
 Yeah, well, that's all right now, mama 
 Anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, mama 
 That's all right with you 
 That's all right, mama 
 Do me anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, that's all right 
 Yeah, that's all right now, mama 
 Anyway you do 
 Piano 
 Well, that's all right, mama 
 That's all right with you 
 That's all right, mama 
 Do me anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, that's all right 
 Yeah, that's all right now, mama 
 Anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, mama 
 That's all right with you 
 That's all right, mama 
 Do me anyway you do 
 Well, that's all right, that's all right 
 Yeah, that's all right now, mamaSouth of the border, down Mexico way 
 That's where I fell in love, when the stars above came out to play 
 And now as I wander, my thoughts ever stray 
 South of the border, down Mexico way 
 She was a picture in old Spanish lace 
 Just for a tender while I kissed a smile upon her face 
 'Cause it was fiesta and we were so gay 
 South of the border, Mexico way 
 Then she sighed as she whispered, ?manana? 
 Never dreaming that we were parting 
 And I lied as a whispered, ?manana? 
 'Cause our tomorrow never came 
 South of the border, I jumped back one day 
 There in a veil of white, by the candlelight, she knelt to pray 
 The mission bells told me that I mustn't stay 
 South of the border, Mexico way 
 The mission bells told me, ding, dong, that I must not stay 
 Stay South of the border, down Mexico wayI told Mary about us I told her about our great sin 
 Mary cried and forgave me and Mary took me back again 
 Said if I wanted my freedom I could be free evermore 
 But I don't wanna be and I don't wanna see Mary cry anymore 
 Oh devil woman devil woman let go of me 
 Devil woman let me be and leave me alone I wanna go home 
 Mary is waitin' and weepin' down in our shack by the sea 
 Even after I've hurt her Mary's still in love with me 
 Devil woman it's over trapped no more by your charms 
 'Cause I don't wanna stay I wanna get away woman let go of my arm 
 Oh devil woman devil woman let go of me 
 Devil woman you're evil like the dark coral reef 
 Like the winds that bring high tides you bring sorrow and grief 
 You made me ashamed to face Mary I barely had the strength to tell 
 Skies're not so black Mary took me back Mary has broken your spell 
 Oh devil woman devil woman let go of me 
 Running along by the seashore running as fast as I can 
 Even the seagulls are happy glad I'm coming home again 
 Never again will I ever cause another tear to fall 
 Down the beach I see what belongs to me the one I want most of all 
 Oh devil woman devil woman don't follow me 
 Devil woman let me be and leave me alone I'm going back homeYou saw me crying in the chapel. 
 The tears I shed were tears of joy 
 I know the meaning of contentment 
 Now I am happy with the lord 
 Just a plain and simple chapel 
 Where humble people go to pray 
 I pray the lord that I'll grow stronger 
 As I live from day to day 
 I've searched and I've searched 
 But I couldn't find 
 No way on earth 
 To gain peace of mind 
 Now I'm happy in the chapel 
 Where people are of one accord 
 We gather in the chapel 
 Just to sing and praise the lord 
 Evr'y sinner looks for something 
 That will put his heart at ease 
 There is only one true answer 
 He must get down on his knees 
 Meet your neighbor in the chapel 
 Join with him in tears of joy 
 You'll know the meaning of contentment 
 Then you'll be happy with the lord 
 You'll search and you'll search 
 But you'll never find 
 No way on earth 
 To gain peace of mind 
 Take your troubles to the chapel 
 Get down on your knees and pray 
 Your burdens will be lighter 
 And you'll surely find the wayIf you wanna make me happy, here is all you gotta do 
 Take me where you're going and I'll take care of you 
 'Cause I got this need that's growing to keep you satisfied 
 And if you keep your green light showing well you can take me for a ride 
 'Cause I la la la la la la love you, 
 And I la la la la la la care. 
 And I really want you with me baby everywhere 
 Well, I like the way you're moving, and I like a the way you go 
 I like the way you let your locomotion show 
 'Cause my drivin' wheel is drivin' and my piston's working good 
 And if your motor gives you some trouble baby, I'll take a look underneath your hood (yes, I would) 
 'Cause I la la la la la la love you, 
 And I la la la la la la care. 
 And I really want you with me baby everywhere 
 Well, I know you like your transportation with a motor and a rubber wheel, 
 But when you move you cause a transformation in this lover and the way I feel 
 So if you want to make me happy here is all you gotta do 
 Just let me ride your boxcar and I'll hobo with you 
 'Cause all I got is on my shoulder, I'm walkin' on my trav'lin' shoes 
 And before I get much older I'm gonna kick these lovesick blues 
 'Cause I la la la la la la love you, 
 And I la la la la la la care. 
 And I really want you with me baby everywhere 
 Yes, I la la la la la la love you, 
 And I la la la la la la care. 
 'Cause I...Chestnuts roasting on an open fire 
 Jack Frost nipping at your nose 
 Yuletide carols being sung by a choir 
 And folks dressed up like Eskimos 
 Everybody knows a turkey and some mistletoe 
 Help to make the season bright 
 Tiny tots with their eyes all aglow 
 Will find it hard to sleep tonight 
 They know that Santa's on his way 
 He's loaded lots of toys and goodies on his sleigh 
 And every mother's child is gonna spy 
 To see if reindeer really know how to fly 
 So I'm offering this simple phrase 
 To kids from one to ninety two 
 Although it's been said many times, many ways 
 Merry Christmas to you 
 So I'm offering this simple phrase 
 To kids from one to ninety two 
 Although it's been said many times, many ways 
 Merry Christmas, Merry Christmas 
 Merry Christmas to youI could have loved her, but she would change her mind. 
 I couldn't leave her 'cause when her sweet face shined 
 I could believe in all her dreams and lies 
 But I could not leave those crazy eyes. 
 Her clothes just suit her, there's no one cuter 
 But watch your step 'cause she's a real straight shooter. 
 She's got a string of broken hearted guys 
 That just could not leave those crazy eyes. 
 Now you hear about all those guys that hang around in bars 
 Weepin' and moanin' about the gal that got away. 
 Moanin' the blues to soft guitars. 
 Wonderin' what time the bars gonna close and 
 How much longer in their lives they're gonna have to pay. 
 'Cause someone smacks you with a thousand highs 
 And just attracts you, hardly even tries 
 That's why I know I won the sweetest prize 
 When I found love in those crazy eyes. 
 Now you hear about all those guys that hang around in bars 
 Weepin' and moanin' about the gal that got away. 
 Moanin' the blues to soft guitars. 
 Wonderin' what time the bars gonna close and 
 How much longer in their lives they're gonna have to pay. 
 When someone smacks you with a thousand highs 
 And just attracts you, hardly even tries 
 That's why I know I won the sweetest prize 
 When I found love in those crazy eyes. 
 When I found love in those crazy, crazy eyesToday I passed you on the street 
 And my heart fell at your feet 
 I can't help it if I'm still in love with you 
 Somebody else stood by your side 
 And she looked so satisfied 
 I can't help it if I'm still in love with you 
 A picture from the past came slowly stealing 
 As I brushed your arm and walked so close to you 
 Then suddenly I got that old time feelin' 
 I can't help it if I'm still in love with you 
 It's hard to know another's lips will kiss you 
 And hold you just the way I used to do 
 Oh, heaven only knows how much I miss you 
 I can't help it if I'm still in love with youIt was in the spring, one sunny day 
 My sweetheart left me, Lord, she went away 
 And now she's gone and I don't worry 
 For I'm sitting on top of the world 
 Mississippi river is deep and wide 
 My sweetheart's living on the other side 
 Now she's gone and I don't worry 
 For I'm sitting on top of the world 
 You don't like my peaches, don't you shake my tree 
 Get out of my orchard, let my peaches be 
 Now she's gone and I don't worry 
 For I'm sitting on top of the world 
 Now she's gone and I don't worry 
 For I'm sitting on top of the worldI can't answer the questions you ask me, 
 I don't know what to say. 
 The answers are somewhere lost in the stars 
 When the night has turned to day. 
 But I know if the silence of night could be here, 
 It would drift through my soul and calm all my fear 
 And I could reach out and draw you so near to me 
 Touch me and warm me and I will lie still. 
 And all that you ask me to give you I will 
 One living moment we'll have for our own. 
 A brief flash of time that we spent unalone. 
 But you ask me for nothing and give what you can 
 And we're wrapped in a pillow of sleep once again 
 And my memory drifts through the universe when we are one 
 Closely we're falling through time 
 And the earth will turn in the silence of space, 
 Always in motion yet always in place 
 And all things will change yet remain what they are. 
 And far will be near and near will be far 
 And the ages will darken and blend into time 
 And all that is poetry will no longer rhyme 
 But our moment together is forever sublime 
 For the time has arrived when we must understand 
 That we're lost in a void on this sad speck of sand 
 And nobody knows where we are, no one cares 
 And the tears that we shed in the dark no one cares 
 And the madmen who plunder this world for their fame 
 Have forgotten that no one remembers their name 
 But time and the universe are always the same 
 Closely we're falling through timeThe story of my life is very plain to read 
 It starts the day you came 
 And ends the day you leave 
 The story of my life begins and ends with you 
 The names are still the same 
 And the story's still the truth 
 I was alone. 
 You found me waiting and made me your own 
 I was afraid 
 That somehow I never could be a man that you wanted of me 
 You're the story of my life, and every word is true 
 Each chapter sings your name 
 Each page begins with you 
 It's the story of our times and never letting go 
 If I die today, I wanted you to know 
 Stay with me here 
 Share with me, care with me 
 Stay and be near 
 And when it began I'd lie awake every night 
 Just knowing somewhere deep inside 
 That our affair just might write 
 The story of my life it's very plain to read 
 It starts the day you came 
 It ends the day you leaveMust you dance every dance with the same fortunate man? 
 You have danced with him since the music began. 
 Won't you change partners and dance with me? 
 Must you dance quite so close with your lips touching his face? 
 Can't you see I'm longing to be in his place? 
 Won't you change partners and dance with me? 
 Ask him to sit this one out and while you're alone, 
 I'll tell the waiter to tell him he's wanted on the telephone. 
 You've been locked in his arms ever since heaven-knows-when. 
 Won't you change partners and then, 
 Ask him to sit this one out and while you're alone, 
 I'll tell the waiter to tell him he's wanted on the telephone 
 You've been locked in his arms ever since heaven knows when. 
 Won't you change partners and then, 
 You may never want to change partners again, 
 You may never want to change partners again.Your cheatin' heart will make you weep 
 You'll cry and cry and try to sleep 
 But sleep won't come the whole night through 
 Your cheatin' heart will tell on you 
 When tears come down like falling rain 
 You'll toss around and call my name 
 You'll walk the floor the way I do 
 Your cheatin' heart will tell on you 
 When tears come down like falling rain 
 You'll toss around and call my name 
 You'll walk the floor the way I do 
 Your cheatin' heart will tell on youThe auctioneer said, I'm not through yet, 
 Here's a horse the likes of which you've never seen, 
 And the straw hats in the sun, with a face beneath each one, 
 Shown doubtful and the auctioneer got mean. 
 Do you think that you can find a horse like this every day? 
 I don't think there's any better on this earth, 
 And the more you pay, the more it's worth. 
 Then out she came, a snow-white mare, 
 Prancin' and a dancin' in the silver sun, 
 They watched her from behind, as she did her bump and grind, 
 Walkin' naked, sad and graceful for their fun. 
 Oh how I wished I could afford that lady painted white, 
 A queen with high nobility of birth, 
 But the more you pay, the more it's worth. 
 My pockets hung with empty blues, 
 Silent heels were standin' on my growin' pains, 
 My bid was not too bad, two bits was all I had, 
 And the stable boy just handed me the reins. 
 Well the gallery went wild, and the auctioneer half smiled, 
 What we don't sell we shoot or give away, 
 'Cause the more you pay, the more it's worth. 
 And where was the boy, who rode on her back, 
 With his arms holding tight round her neck? 
 How tightly he clung, 
 When they both were young, 
 And fate had not let this poor girl be so 
 Disgraced.Black crows in the summer sky. Wheat fields turned to gold. 
 Workers in the blazing sun. Forests in the cold. 
 Farmers in a cabin room. Portraits of your eyes 
 Look at me in painful gloom, they've seen so many lies. 
 You who love the truth, you who love the truth, 
 You who love the truth have seen, so many lies. 
 Skeletons smoke cigarettes. A blazing sun that never sets. 
 A purple forest in the haze. Hands that know of common ways. 
 Some survive their shattered dreams, but you are lost in colour schemes 
 Falling down between the seams, you've seen so many lies. 
 You who love the truth, you who love the truth, 
 You who love the truth have seen, so many lies. 
 I wonder how you'd feel today, if you knew the millions that they'd paid 
 For canvas glowing with your heat, shown in airconditioned suites 
 With glass and steel and carpet floors, stored in crypts as cold as yours. 
 Portraits of your bleeding eyes, eyes that saw so many lies. 
 You who love the truth, you who love the truth, 
 You who love the truth have seen, so many lies. 
 You who love the truth, you who love the truth, you who love the truthThere's a danger zone, not a stranger zone 
 Than the little plot I walk on that I call my home 
 Full of eerie sights, weird and skeery sights 
 Ev'ry vicious animal that creeps and crawls and bites! 
 On the Amazon, the prophylactics prowl On the Amazon, the hypodermics howl On 
 The Amazon, you'll hear a scarab scowl and sting zodiacs on the wing 
 All the stalactites and vicious vertebrae 
 Hunt the stalagmites while laryngitis slay 
 All that parasites that come from Paraguay in the spring 
 Hmm, hmm hmmm 
 Snarling equinox among the rocks will seize you 
 And the fahrenheit comes out at night to freeze you 
 Wild duodenum are lurking in the trees 
 And the jungle swarms with green apostrophes 
 Oh, the Amazon is calling me 
 On the Amazon, the pax vobiscum bite 
 On the Amazon, the epiglottis fight 
 On the Amazon, the hemispheres at night all slink where the agnostics drink 
 All the hippodromes that lie concealed in mud 
 Hunt the metronomes that live in swamp and flood 
 Then the kodachromes run out and drink their blood, poor ginks 
 While velocipedes among the weeds will scare you 
 And the menopause with hungry jaws ensnares you 
 Frenzied adenoids infest the hills and slopes 
 Everyone avoids the deadly stethoscopes 
 Oh, the Amazon is calling 
 Yes, the Amazon is calling 
 Oh, the Amazon is calling me-ee!As I was a-gwine down the road, 
 With a tired team and a heavy load, 
 I crack'd my whip and the leader sprung, 
 I says day-day to the wagon tongue. 
 Turkey in the straw, turkey in the hay, 
 Roll 'em up and twist 'em up a high tuckahaw 
 And twist 'em up a tune called Turkey in the Straw. 
 Went out to milk, and I didn't know how, 
 I milked the goat instead of the cow. 
 A monkey sittin' on a pile of straw, 
 A-winkin' at his mother-in-law. 
 Turkey in the straw, turkey in the hay, 
 Roll 'em up and twist 'em up a high tuckahaw 
 And twist 'em up a tune called Turkey in the Straw. 
 Met Mr. Catfish comin' down stream. 
 Says Mr. Catfish, "What does you mean?" 
 Caught Mr. Catfish by the snout, 
 And turned Mr. Catfish wrong side out. 
 Turkey in the straw, turkey in the hay, 
 Roll 'em up and twist 'em up a high tuckahaw 
 And twist 'em up a tune called Turkey in the Straw. 
 Came to a river and I couldn't get across, 
 Paid five dollars for a blind old hoss; 
 Wouldn't go ahead, nor he wouldn't stand still, 
 So he went up and down like an old saw mill. 
 Turkey in the straw, turkey in the hay, 
 Roll 'em up and twist 'em up a high tuckahaw 
 And twist 'em up a tune called Turkey in the Straw. 
 As I came down the new cut road, 
 Met Mr. Bullfrog, met Miss Toad 
 And every time Miss Toad would sing, 
 Old Bullfrog cut a pigeon wing. 
 Turkey in the straw, turkey in the hay, 
 Roll 'em up and twist 'em up a high tuckahaw 
 And twist 'em up a tune called Turkey in the Straw. 
 Oh I jumped in the seat and I gave a little yell 
 The horses ran away, broke the wagon all to hell 
 Sugar in the gourd and honey in the horn 
 I never been so happy since the day I was born. 
 Turkey in the straw, turkey in the hay, 
 Roll 'em up and twist 'em up a high tuckahaw 
 And twist 'em up a tune called Turkey in the Straw.There's a saying old says that love is blind 
 Still were often told, seek and ye shall find 
 So I'm going to seek a certain lad I've had in mind 
 Looking everywhere, haven't found him yet 
 Hes the big affair I cannot forget 
 Only man I ever think of with regret 
 Id like to add his initial to my monogram 
 Tell me, where is the shepherd for this lost lamb? 
 There's a somebody I'm longing to see 
 I hope that he turns out to be 
 Someone who'll watch over me 
 I'm a little lamb whos lost in the wood 
 I know I could always be good 
 Someone who'll watch over me 
 Although he may not be the man some 
 Girls think of as handsome 
 To my heart he carries the key 
 Wont you tell him please to put on some speed 
 Follow my lead, oh, how I need 
 Someone to watch over meO little town of Bethlehem 
 How still we see thee lie 
 Above thy deep and dreamless sleep 
 The silent stars go by 
 Yet in thy dark streets shineth 
 The everlasting light 
 The hopes and fears of all the years 
 Are met in thee tonight 
 For Christ is born of Mary 
 And gathered all above 
 While mortals sleep, the angels keep 
 Their watch of wondering love 
 O morning stars together 
 Proclaim the holy birth 
 And praises sing to God the King 
 And peace to men on earth 
 Yet in thy dark streets shineth 
 The everlasting light 
 The hopes and fears of all the years 
 Are met in thee tonight 
 O holy Child of Bethlehem 
 Descend to us we pray 
 Cast out our sin and enter in 
 Be born in us today 
 We hear the Christmas Angels 
 The great glad tidings see 
 For born to us in Bethlehem 
 Is Jesus Christ the King 
 Born to us in Bethlehem 
 Is Jesus Christ the KingA step in the right direction, a stitch in time saves nine 
 To me you are perfection, and the love you saved was mine. 
 When I think of all the girls that I've ever kissed 
 And the ones that I'd wished I could know, 
 It's a real short list with just one name, you're one in a row. 
 You're a class by yourself 
 You're the state of the art 
 You're alone on the shelf 
 You're the top of the chart 
 You're the singular case 
 You're the queen of the place 
 You're the star of the show 
 You're one in a row 
 There's one chance in a million, there's one sun up in the sky. 
 I'm glad you were willin', and here's the reason why. 
 When I think of all the girls that I've ever kissed 
 And the ones that I'd wished I could know, 
 It's a real short list with just one name, you're one in a row. 
 You're the unrivaled champ 
 You're the boss of the camp 
 You're the mavin of charm 
 You're a shot in the arm 
 You're alone in the bunch 
 You're a dark horse hunch 
 You're a heavy-weight blow 
 You're one in a rowBy the waters 
 The waters 
 Of Babylon. 
 We lay down and wept 
 And wept 
 For thee Zion. 
 We remember 
 Thee remember 
 Thee remember 
 Thee ZionOnce I lived the life of a millionaire 
 Spending my money, I didn't care 
 I carried my friends out for a good time 
 Bying bootleg liquor, champagne and wine 
 Then I began to fall so low 
 I didn't have a friend, and no place to go 
 So if I ever get my hand on a dollar again 
 I'm gonna hold on to it till them eagle's green 
 Nobody knows you when you down and out 
 In my pocket not one penny 
 And my friends I haven't any 
 But If I ever get on my feet again 
 Then I'll meet my long lost friend 
 It's mighty strange, without a doubt 
 Nobody knows you when you down and out 
 I mean when you down and out 
 Mmmmmmmm, when you're down and out 
 Mmmmmmmm, not one penny 
 And my friends I haven't any 
 Mmmmmmmm, Well I felt so low 
 Nobody wants me round their door 
 Mmmmmmmm, Without a doubt, 
 No man can use you wen you down and out 
 I mean when you down and outI got no money, got no job, I'm just another shufflin' slob. 
 Well we've all been disappointed, we've had our dreams before. 
 For with dreams you learn to take your turn 
 In a world that don't believe in nothin' anymore. 
 Some believe in Jesus. They don't act like they do. 
 Some believe in Mohammed. I don't believe that's true. 
 'Cause they do believe in money, and gold is what it's for. 
 All the gold can't buy no peace of mind 
 In a world that don't believe in nothin' anymore. 
 She is a woman, with a baby child. A sacrificed human. Now she's runnin' wild. 
 Well her dreams have all been shattered, her dignity defiled. 
 She has lost her way but she must stay 
 In a world that don't believe in nothin' anymore. 
 Some believe in love. Where did it go? 
 Some believe in children. Even they now know 
 That we do believe in money, and gold is what it's for. 
 All the gold can't buy no peace of mind 
 In a world that don't believe in nothin' anymore. 
 I believe in you, I believe in me and I don't care what the papers say. 
 I believe in struggle, I believe in life, I believe that we will find a way. 
 I believe in hope, I believe in dreams, I believe in luck, I believe in schemes 
 I believe in fate, I believe in time, I believe what I believe ain't worth a dime. 
 'Cause we do believe in money, and gold is what it's for. 
 All the gold can't buy no peace of mind 
 In a world that don't believe in nothin' anymore. 
 I'll go on livin', I'll pay the cost. I'll keep on givin' to those who are lost. 
 'Cause the children will be coming and they'll soon know the score. 
 They must understand I've played my hand 
 In a world that don't believeI've got your picture that you gave to me 
 And it's signed with love just like it used to be 
 The only thing different the only thing new 
 I've got your picture he's with you 
 I've got the records that we used to share 
 And they sound the same as when you were here 
 The only thing different the only thing new 
 I've got your records he's got you 
 I've got your memory or has it got me 
 I really don't know but I know it won't let me be 
 I've got your class ring oh that proved you'd care 
 And it still looks the same as when you gave it dear 
 The only thing different the only thing new 
 I've got these things and he's with youI don't know why I did it, I guess I lost my head 
 I should have said 'I love you' but used angry words instead 
 Angry words that were so unfair 
 Angry words, I should have said 'I care' 
 It's easy to apologize, it's harder to forget 
 You made the loving easy but I made you so upset 
 With angry words that were so unfair 
 Angry words, I should have said 'I care' 
 I've stood right beside you, I've changed in many ways 
 I stand here ever faithful but I still have my bad days 
 And angry words can sometimes fly 
 Angry words where once I use to cry 
 It's easy to apologize, it's harder to forget 
 You made the loving easy but I made you so upset 
 With angry words, that were so unfair 
 Angry words, I should have said 'I care' 
 Angry words, that were so unfair 
 I should have said 'I care'Winter has me in its grip 
 Think I'll take a summer trip 
 On a sunny sailing ship 
 Where the shells lie in the sand 
 I feel so lonely 
 I'm to young to feel this old 
 I need you and you only 
 When the weather gets this cold. That's why 
 Winter has me in its grip 
 Think I'll take a summer trip 
 On a sunny sailing ship 
 Where the shells lie in the sand 
 There's no use in going 
 'Cause it's cold inside my heart 
 And it's always snowing 
 Since the day we broke apart. 
 Winter has me in its grip 
 Think I'll take a summer trip 
 On a sunny sailing ship 
 Where the shells lie in the sand. 
 I tried to run from winter 
 Like this spring and summer run to fall 
 But when the weather's in you 
 There's no hiding place at all, that's why 
 Winter has me in its grip 
 Think I'll take a summer trip 
 On a sunny sailing ship 
 Where the shells lie in the sand.I want her so bad 
 Mother Nature has a hold on me 
 I want her so bad 
 Mother Nature won't you let me be untied? 
 'Cause it hurts my pride 
 To be tossed off like the morning covers 
 And crossed off, like her other lovers 
 Casually 
 I see her walking by my window- mhmmhmmhmmhmm! 
 It seems to me I know her well. 
 But like the flowers in the spring-time, 
 Growing toward the sunshine, 
 Her beauty falls upon me in a fragrant spring-time spell 
 And I want her so ba-aa-aad 
 Mother Nature has a HOLD on me 
 I want her so bad 
 Mother Nature won't you let me be untied? 
 'Cause it hurts my pride 
 To be tossed off like the morning covers 
 And crossed off, like her other lovers 
 Casually 
 Is she an icy winter woman? Mm-hhmm! 
 That chills my body when she's near 
 Sweet fever in the morning... 
 I don't know if I'll survive. 
 She walks by me as though she didn't 
 Know I was alive 
 And I want her so ba-aa-aad 
 Mother Nature has a hold on me 
 I want her so bad 
 Mother Nature won't you let me be untied? 
 'Cause it hurts my pride 
 To be tossed off like the morning covers 
 And crossed off, like her other lovers 
 Tossed off like the morning covers, 
 Crossed off, like her other lovers... 
 Tossed off like the morning covers, 
 Crossed off, like her other lovers...From what I have been hearing, dear, you've really got it made 
 Got a lot of fellers on your lover's hit parade 
 If I can't be your number one I don't know what I'll do 
 Gotta get my love up to the top, I'm so in love with you 
 On the hit parade of love I know I'll never stop 
 I've got a long, long way to climb before I reach the top 
 But if I do get there soon I'll really have it made 
 Then I'll know I'm number one on your lover's hit parade 
 Well, we get along, dear, like all good lovers should 
 Yet we could make a go of it, I know it'd turn out good 
 We could have so much fun, we'd really have it made 
 Then I'll know I'm number one on your lover's hit parade 
 On the hit parade of love I know I'll never stop 
 I've got a long, long way to climb before I reach the top 
 But if I do get there soon I'll really have it made 
 Then I know I'm number one on your lover's hit parade 
 Well, it's your heart I'm after, dear, 'cause you're so nice and fine 
 And another to replace you, dear, would sure be hard to find 
 So put your arms around me now and call me turtle dove 
 Then I know I'm number one on your hit parade of love 
 On the hit parade of love I know I'll never stop 
 I've got a long, long way to climb before I reach the top 
 But if I do get there soon I'll really have it made 
 Then I know I'm number one on your lover's hit parade 
 Then I know I'm number one on your lover's hit paradeNo one can take your place with me 
 And time has proven that I'm right 
 There's no place I'd rather be 
 Than at your place for the night 
 No time can pass your sight unseen 
 No moment steals away unfound 
 Lifetime lived in such a dream 
 Floats like a feather to the ground 
 And for the first time I've been seeing 
 The things I'd never notice without you 
 And for the first time I'm discovering 
 The things I used to treasure about you 
 The birds like leaves on Winterwood 
 Sing hopeful songs on dismal days 
 They've learned to live life as they should 
 They are at peace with Nature's ways 
 You are as natural as the night 
 And all that springs from you is good 
 And the children born beneath your light 
 Are like the birds on Winterwood 
 And for the first time I've been seeing 
 The things I'd never notice without you 
 And for the first time I'm discovering 
 The things I used to treasure about youI find you in my arms, this is how it begins 
 And we are so close, like Siamese twins. 
 Though you're separate from me, and we're often apart 
 Still nobody can see, that we're joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 You don't look like me it's true and I don't look like you 
 As we lead separate lives our secret still survives 
 Only we know our special affection, 
 Only we know our secret connection. 
 Now you're back in my arms, at the end of the day 
 And like Siamese twins, with each other we'll stay. 
 Though you're separate from me, and we're often apart 
 Still nobody can see, that we're joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Joined at the heart. 
 Still nobody can see, that we're joined at the heartIsn't it strange how a man hides his feelings? 
 Sometimes the one that he loves never knows. 
 And isn't strange when she's finally leaving 
 That it all starts to show when she goes. 
 I passed my friend, he didn't look the way he did before 
 I always knew he was a stronger man than me. 
 I asked my friend if he needed any help from me. 
 He said she's all I need, I know you know. 
 I only wish I had told her long ago. 
 Isn't it strange how a man hides his feelings? 
 Sometimes the one that he loves never knows. 
 And isn't strange when she's finally leaving 
 That it all starts to show when she goes. 
 I once found love, but never got beyond my selfish dreams. 
 I took for granted that she'd be there every day. 
 I closed her out, knowing she could never change he lovin' ways. 
 Things fell apart and she got scared. 
 I wonder if she knew how much I really cared. 
 Isn't it strange how a man hides his feelings? 
 Sometimes the one that he loves never knows. 
 And isn't strange when she's finally leaving 
 That it all starts to show when she goes, starts to go away. 
 Yeah, isn't it strange when she's finally leaving 
 That it all starts to show when she goes. 
 You may find love, if you do you're fortunate. 
 'Cause that's the rarest thing in all the world you'll find. 
 Someone who cares, who shares the good an bad of it. 
 You just make sure she understands how much you care 
 And wherever you may go she will be there. 
 Isn't it strange how a man hides his feelings? 
 Sometimes the one that he loves never knows. 
 And isn't strange when she's finally leaving 
 That it all starts to show when she goes, starts to go awayI coulda been most anything I put my mind to be, 
 But a cowboy's life was the only life for me. 
 It's a strong man's occupation ridin' herd and livin' free, 
 But strong men often fail 
 Where shrewd men can prevail, 
 I'm an old man now with nothin' left to say, 
 But oh god how I worked my youth away. 
 Well you may not recognise my face, I used to be a star, 
 A cowboy hero known both near and far. 
 I perched upon a silver mount and sang with my guitar, 
 But the studio of course, 
 Owned my saddle and my horse, 
 But that six-gun on the wall belongs to me, 
 Oh god I can't live a memory. 
 You know I'd like to put my finger on that trigger once again, 
 And point that gun at all the prideful men. 
 All the voyeurs and the lawyers who can pull a fountain pen, 
 And put you where they choose, 
 With the language that they use, 
 And enslave you till you work your youth away, 
 Oh god how I worked my youth away. 
 Whoopee ty yioh 
 Whoopee ty yi ay, 
 One man's work is another man's play 
 Oh god how I worked my youth away. 
 You see I always liked the notion of a cowboy fighting crime, 
 This photograph was taken in my prime, 
 I could beat those desperados but there's no sense fightin' time, 
 But the singin' was a ball 
 'Cause I'm not musical at all, 
 I moved my lips to someone else's voice. 
 I coulda been most anything I put my mind to be, 
 But a cowboy's life was the only life for me. 
 It's a strong man's occupation ridin' herd and livin' free, 
 But strong men often fail 
 Where shrewd men can prevail, 
 I'm an old man now with nothin' left to say, 
 But oh god how I worked my youth away.Time goes by and I still love you 
 Place no one on earth above you 
 Time goes by and still I haven't changed 
 Time goes by and I still miss you 
 Wanna hold you close and kiss you 
 Time goes by and still I haven't changed 
 You told me to forget you 
 And find somebody new 
 But I don't want somebody else 
 I'm still in love with you 
 I love you and you should know it 
 What else must I do to show it 
 Time goes by and still I haven't changed 
 I love you, I do so madly 
 So completely and so gladly 
 Time goes by and still I haven't changed 
 Like a ship that needs a captain 
 I need you, that's all I'm askin' 
 Time goes by and still I haven't changed 
 So give me what I cry for 
 It's you I'm thinkin' of 
 I can't be any different 
 You see, I'm still in love 
 Say you care and really show it 
 Hold me close and make me know it 
 Time goes by and still I haven't changedThere you go and baby, here am I. 
 Well, you left me here so I could sit and cry. 
 Well, golly gee, what have you done to me? 
 Well I guess it doesn't matter any more. 
 Do you remember baby, last September 
 How you held me tight, each and every night? 
 Well, whoopsy daisy, how you drove me crazy. 
 Well I guess it doesn't matter any more. 
 There's no use in me a-cryin'. 
 I've done everything and now I'm sick of tryin'. 
 I've thrown away my nights, 
 Wasted all my days over you. 
 Now you go your way and I'll go mine 
 Now and forever till the end of time. 
 I'll find somebody new, and baby, we'll say we're through 
 And you won't matter anymore. 
 There's no use in me a-cryin'. 
 I've done everything and now I'm sick of tryin'. 
 I've thrown away my nights, 
 Wasted all my days over you. 
 Well you go your way and I'll go mine 
 Now and forever till the end of time. 
 I'll find somebody new, and baby, we'll say we're through 
 And you won't matter anymore. 
 And you won't matter anymore. 
 And you won't matter anymore.When I see you on the street, I lose my concentration. Just the thought that we 
 Might meet creates anticipation. 
 Won't you look my way once before you go and my eyes will say what you ought to 
 Know. Well I've been thinkin' about you day and night... and I don't know if 
 It'll work out right... but somehow I think that it just might... if we try. 
 Faces come and faces go in circular rotation. But something yearns within to 
 Grow beyond infatuation. 
 Won't you look my way once before you go and my eyes will say what you ought to 
 Know. Well you've got me standin' deaf and blind... 'cause I see love as just a 
 State of mind... and who knows what it is that we might find... if we try. 
 You're walking a different direction from most people I've met. You're givin' 
 Me signs of affection I don't usually get. I don't want you to pledge your 
 Future the future's not yours to give. Just stand there a little longer and let 
 Me watch while you live. 
 'Cause when I see you on the street, I lose my concentration. And just the 
 Thought that we might meet creates anticipation. 
 Won't you look my way once before you go and my eyes will say what you ought to 
 Know. Well I've been thinking about you day and night... and I don't know if it 
 Will work out right... but somehow I think that it just might... if we try. 
 Somehow I think that it just might if we try. Yes somehow I think that it just 
 Might if we try.spoken: 
 One, two, three, four! 
 Fortune has me well in hand, armies wait at my command 
 My gold lies in a foreign land buried deep beneath the sand 
 The angels guide my ev'ry tread, my enemies are sick or dead 
 But all the victories I've led haven't brought you to my bed 
 You see, everybody loves me, baby, what's the matter with you? 
 Won't ya tell me what did I do to offend you? 
 Now the purest race I've bred for thee to live in my democracy 
 And the highest human pedigree awaits the first-born boy baby 
 And my face on ev'ry coin engraved, the anarchists are all enslaved 
 My own flag is forever waved by the grateful people I have saved 
 You see, everybody loves me, baby, what's the matter with you? 
 Won't ya tell me what did I do to offend you? 
 Now, no land is beyond my claim when the land is seized in the people's name 
 By evil men who rob and maim, if war is hell, I'm not to blame! 
 Why, you can't blame me, I'm Heaven's child, I'm the second son of Mary mild 
 And I'm twice removed from Oscar Wilde, but he didn't mind, why, he just smiled 
 Yes, and the ocean parts when I walk through, and the clouds dissolve and the sky turns blue 
 I'm held in very great value by everyone I meet but you 
 'Cause I've used my talents as I could, I've done some bad, I've done some good 
 I did a whole lot better than they thought I would so, c'mon and treat me like you should! 
 Because everybody loves me, baby, what's the matter with you? 
 Tell me what did I do to offend you? (whoo, yeah!) 
 Everybody loves me, baby, what's the matter with you? 
 Tell me what did I do to offend you? 
 Yeah, everybody loves me, baby, what's the matter with you? 
 Tell me what did I do to offend you?There was a mummy at the fair, all crumpled in a folding chair. 
 The people passed, but didn't care that the mummy was a man, 
 So tell me if you can 
 Who are you? Who are you? 
 Where have you been, where are you going to? 
 Well, Andrew McCrew must have lost his way 
 'Cause though he died long ago he was buried today. 
 Down on nightmare alley, where the shady people sway 
 A hobo came a-hikin' on a salty summer day 
 Well he hopped a freight in Dallas, and he rode out of sight 
 But on a turn he slipped, and he lost his grip 
 And he fell in-to the night. 
 Who are you? Who are you? 
 Where have you been, where are you going to? 
 Well, Andrew McCrew must have lost his way 
 'Cause though he died long ago he was buried today. 
 Well, Andrew had one leg of wood, the other leg was small. 
 And when he fell off the train that night he found he had no legs at all. 
 Well they found him in the thicket, and the undertaker came. 
 And they mummified his body for a relative to claim. 
 Who are you? Who are you? 
 Where have you been, where are you going to? 
 Well, Andrew McCrew must have lost his way 
 'Cause though he died long ago he was buried today. 
 But no one came to claim him, until the carnival passed through. 
 The carnies took him to their tent and they decided what to do. 
 Well they dressed him in a worn-out tux and they put him on a stand. 
 And millions saw the legend called the 'famous mummy man'. 
 Who are you? Who are you? 
 Where have you been, where are you going to? 
 Well, Andrew McCrew must have lost his way 
 'Cause though he died long ago he was buried today. 
 Well, what a way to live a life and what a way to die. 
 Left to live a living death with no one left to cry. 
 Petrified amazement, and wonder beyond worth, 
 A man who found more life in death than life gave him at birth. 
 Who are you? Who are you? 
 Where have you been, where are you going to? 
 Well, Andrew McCrew must have lost his way 
 'Cause though he died long ago he was buried today. 
 But what about the ones who live and wish that they could go. 
 Whose lives are lost to living and performing for the show. 
 Well at least you got the best of life until it got the best of you, 
 So from all of us, to what's left of you, 
 Farewell, Andrew McCrewI'm a travelin' man 
 I've made a lot of stops all over the world 
 And in every part I own the heart 
 Of at least one lovely girl 
 I've a pretty Seniorita waiting for me 
 Down in old Mexico 
 If you're ever in Alaska stop and see 
 My cute little Eskimo 
 Oh my sweet Fraulien down in Berlin town 
 Makes my heart start to yearn 
 And my China doll down in old Hong Kong 
 Waits for my return 
 Pretty Polynesian baby over the sea 
 I remember the night 
 When we walked in the sands of the Waikiki 
 And I held you oh so tight 
 Oh my sweet Fraulien down in Berlin town 
 Makes my heart start to yearn 
 And my China doll down in old Hong Kong 
 Waits for my return 
 Pretty Polynesian baby over the sea 
 I remember the night 
 When we walked in the sands of the Waikiki 
 And I held you oh so tight 
 Oh, I'm a travelin' man 
 Yes, I'm a travelin' manYou have lived such a gentle life upon this earth 
 That I am stunned by your sight. 
 If I could give but a token of the love you have, 
 Then I might not be this lonely tonight. 
 Let them have their smug and their cool, confined by fashion and peer. 
 I love you for your courage in this frightened atmosphere. 
 I love you for your courage in this frightened atmosphere. 
 Oh, there are so few brave one's like you. Need I explain? 
 Never wondering what to do, what to venture, what to gain. 
 And, you have loved, in a total way, from flesh to soul. 
 You speak, without coy without pose. 
 Your eyes can see that the emperor has lost his clothes. 
 And what's more, you'll tell the whole world what he stole. 
 Let them have their fad and their fix, confined by fashion and peer. 
 I love you for your courage in this frightened atmosphere. 
 I love you for your courage in this frightened atmosphere.I don't want to be like old George Reeves 
 Stuck in a Superman role. 
 I've got a long way to go in my career 
 And some day my fame will make it clear 
 That I had to be a Superman 
 He came from another place deep in his mind 
 As far as the planets in space. 
 As galaxy's mysteries start to unwind 
 Some changes are bound to take place. 
 Though gravity constantly weighs on my travels 
 My mission is close to adrift 
 Though I can be strong when my power unravels 
 I still come to you for a lift. 
 I don't want to be like old George Reeves 
 Stuck in a Superman role. 
 I've got a long way to go in my career 
 And some day my fame will make it clear 
 That I had to be a Superman 
 I know I can fly when my plane hits the sky 
 I believe I've got nothing to lose. 
 But when I'm alone with the bed and the phone 
 I get the terminal metropolis blues 
 I flew to the coast where Superman's Ghost 
 Lay shot on the bedroom floor 
 He said "Watch out for TV it crucified me, 
 But it can't crucify me no more." 
 I don't want to be like old George Reeves 
 Stuck in a Superman role. 
 I've got a long way to go in my career 
 And some day my fame will make it clear 
 That I had to be a Superman 
 "I'm red white and blue, I've got justice to do 
 I'm the man of your fantasy dreams 
 But I'm an alien man from an alien land 
 Who's alive on your orthicon screens. 
 I once ruled the world and when flags were unfurled 
 I performed for you live not on tape. 
 But the public is cruel when played for a fool 
 As you see by the blood on my cape." 
 I don't want to be like old George Reeves 
 Stuck in a Superman role. 
 I've got a long way to go in my career 
 And some day my fame will make it clear 
 That I had to be a Superman 
 "Well I never was real or stronger than steel. 
 I'm a figment of Freudian need. 
 And the video screen is a psychotic scene 
 And it's all done with mirrors and green 
 My agent just called, the talks have been stalled 
 I soon will be pulled from the air. 
 But the image persists in the video mists 
 That a Superman still will be there!" 
 I don't want to be like old George Reeves 
 Stuck in a Superman role. 
 I've got a long way to go in my career 
 And some day my fame will make it clear 
 That I had to be a SupermanSometimes when I'm thinkin' that love's not around 
 My heart begins sinkin', I don't hear a sound 
 And the world is in blackness, no light shines on me 
 I suffer no blindness, no one can I see 
 Then a flash from the heavens like a loud jagged wire 
 And the silence is broken, and the night is on fire. 
 It's like chain lightning, this love that I feel. 
 Who know's where it strikes or ]when it will hit, 
 How long it will last, or when it will quit. 
 In the forest I'm burning, struck down by the blast 
 The fever is churning, and the heat rises fast. 
 And those standing nearest can show their concern 
 But I swear if they touch me that they too will burn. 
 They fear for their lives for death will soon dwell 
 In the warmth of your love is the fire of hell. 
 It's like chain lightning, this love that I feel. 
 Who knows where it strikes or when it will hit, 
 How long it will last, or when it will quit. 
 And soon the sparks scatter and wind whips the flame 
 And love will soon shatter what it cannot tame 
 And the cycle continues, from life into dust 
 For I am now in you with the fire of lust. 
 And I hear the explosion, of thunder and rain, 
 The water is falling, the ashes remain. 
 It's like chain lightning, this love that I feel. 
 Who knows where it strikes or ]when it will hit, 
 How long it will last, or when it will quit. 
 The Indians tell us that the phoenix can rise 
 From the smoldering ashes that once were my eyes 
 And watch beautiful colours from black and from grey 
 Be formed into wings and take me away 
 Where evil is darkness and goodness is light 
 And love is the lightning that cuts through the night 
 And strikes only once in a dark place in time 
 And forms a gold stairway that all of us climbRust on your fingers, you got rubble at your feet 
 Keep the home fires burning, but look out for the heat 
 'Cause there's a man at the window who knows just what you think 
 And there's a water boy behind you who won't give you a drink 
 Well it's a hard, hard times, no easy road in sight 
 It takes a great big man to win a great big fight 
 When it comes to dying, no matter what you tell 
 They're gonna let you into heaven 'cause you lived your life in hell 
 Well they've got no way to reward you but to let those breezes blow 
 And you've got nothing left to do but to let your anger show 
 'Cause it's a hard, hard time, no easy road in sight 
 It takes a great big man to win a great big fight 
 Think about your baby, think about your wife 
 Just think about your banker who's trying to take your life 
 Think about this planet that's rolling through the night 
 Then tell me 
 Can you turn your back on such a great big fight? 
 You've got the muscle, big man, you got the power 
 But you're getting weaker with each passing hour 
 Just like a flame in the rain, like a light in the night 
 Well if it's you that must stay, well then it's you that must fight 
 'Cause it's a hard, hard time, your future's not bright 
 It takes a great big man to win a great big 
 Great big man to win a great big fightI chased a lot of rainbows 
 Down a lot of roads 
 Thinking love was something to be bought or sold 
 But I finally found a treasure 
 And it's right here in your eyes 
 Now my golden dreams are of golden rings 
 Precious love without a price 
 I'm going for the gold 
 For the heart's that's in you 
 I'm going for the love 
 That I know will be true 
 I've had enough 
 Of those one night stands 
 I'm going for the gold that's in a wedding band 
 I followed those illusions 
 That sparkled in the night 
 But they were fantasies that disappeared in the light 
 The midnight fires that burned so bright 
 Turn to ashes in the dawn 
 I didn't realize how empty I was inside 
 Until you came along 
 I'm going for the gold 
 For the heart's that's in you 
 I'm going for the love 
 That I know will be true 
 I've had enough 
 Of those one night stands 
 I'm going for the gold that's in a wedding band 
 I'm going for the gold 
 For the heart's that's in you 
 I'm going for the love 
 That I know will be true 
 I've had enough 
 Of those one night stands 
 I'm going for the gold that's in a wedding band 
 I'm going for the gold 
 For the heart's that's in you 
 I'm going for the love 
 That I know will be true 
 I've had enough 
 Of those one night stands 
 I'm going for the gold that's in a wedding band 
 I'm going for the gold 
 For the heart's that's in you 
 I'm going for the love 
 That I know will be true 
 I've had enough 
 Of those one night stands 
 I'm going for the gold that's in a wedding bandOh, Mary, this London's a wonderful sight 
 With people here working by day and by night 
 They don't sow potatoes nor barley nor wheat 
 But there's gangs of them diggin' for gold in the street 
 At least when I asked them, that's what I was told 
 So I just took a hand at this diggin' for gold 
 But for all that I've found there, I might as well be 
 In the place where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the sea 
 I believe that when writin' a wish you expressed 
 As to how the fine ladies of London were dressed 
 But if you'll believe me, when asked to a ball 
 They don't wear no tops to their dresses at all 
 Oh, I've seen them myself and you could not in truth 
 Tell if they were bound for a ball or a bath 
 Don't be startin' them fashions now, Mary McRee 
 In the place where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the sea 
 There's beautiful girls here, oh, never you mind 
 Beautiful shapes nature never designed 
 Lovely complexions of roses and cream 
 But let me remark with regard to the same 
 That if at those roses you venture to sit 
 The colors might all come away on your lip 
 So I'll wait for the wild rose that's waitin' for me 
 In the place where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the sea 
 You remember young Diddy McClaren, of course 
 But he's over here with the rest of the force 
 I saw him one day as he stood on the strand 
 Stopped all the traffic with a wave of his hand 
 As we were talking of days that are gone 
 The whole town of London stood there to look on 
 But for all his great powers, he's wishful like me 
 To be back where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the seaIn Nineteen Sixty Seven the draft caught up with me, 
 Me and my pal Joe went off to war. 
 We might find hero's heaven, but we'd keep the country free. 
 We would surely win just like before. 
 Roy Rogers he was on his horse, and Buck Jones drew his gun. 
 We would surely win of course when the battle was all done. 
 Nineteen Sixty Seven I came back alone, 
 They brought Joe back in plastic on the plane. 
 Nineteen Sixty Seven seems so long ago, 
 But I can't forget my friend or ease my pain. 
 His family may forget him, his children may regret him, 
 His wife may find another and go on. 
 His picture may grow faded and the world he knew gone jaded 
 But as long as I shall live I surely know, 
 I never will forget my buddy Joe. 
 In Nineteen Sixty Seven, the war was raging on, 
 Our country was divided and reborn. 
 Though I was back at home, I had never left Saigon, 
 'Cause all I got was ridicule and scorn. 
 This was no place for hero's now, they all seemed to resent me, 
 They saidThe river of love is risin' at my doorstep, it won't let me be. 
 I keep dreamin' of you and what the river will do 
 As it starts flowin' over me. 
 The river of love is risin' by my window, it won't let me sleep. 
 It's so windy and black and there's no turnin' back 
 'Cause I know I'm in so deep. 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, 
 So deep in the river of love. 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, 
 So deep in the river of love. 
 I got to go where it takes me 
 I got to follow the flow. 
 I got to follow that feelin' 
 Wherever the river may go. 
 The river of love is always all around me, since I took my leap. 
 It will carry me through and keep me with you 
 'Cause you know I'm in so deep. 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, 
 So deep in the river of love. 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, 
 So deep in the river of love. 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, (in so deep) 
 In so deep, 
 So deep in the river of love. 
 The river of loveOn the first floor... On the first floor... 
 On the first floor there's a young girl reeling 
 Her body's numb and without feeling 
 As illusions dance on the midnight ceiling 
 Now she's falling, now she's kneeling 
 It's almost like she's bowed in prayer 
 A savior she's about to bear 
 She screams for help, but no one's there... 
 On the first floor... 
 On the first floor people walk the halls 
 But none can hear her desperate calls 
 There is no sound beyond the walls 
 So to the telephone she crawls 
 She telephones her only friend 
 The one on whom she can depend 
 But the phone rings on without an end 
 Then rings no more... On the first floor... 
 There's a party on the second floor 
 And through the picture window you can see them all 
 They're laughing and they're dancing 
 Admiring the Renoir that's hanging on the wall 
 But in the master bedroom where the coats are piled high 
 A silent, satin lady thinks of what it's like to die 
 And as she dwells on all the years she still has left to face 
 She wonders how she'll ever find someone to take his place 
 Then suddenly she's jarred by the ringing of the phone 
 Oh, why do you ring now, just when I want to be alone? 
 So she walks into the bathroom and drinks some water from a cup 
 But the telephone stops ringing just before she picks it up... 
 My family was very poor 
 So I worked hard to be secure 
 I married one I had to wed 
 And not the one I loved instead 
 When I was young my blood ran wild 
 But we stayed married for the child 
 Now three flights up, I'm all alone 
 My wife is dead, my child is grown 
 My daughter leads a wayward life 
 She's been a failure as a wife 
 And though she lives just one floor down 
 She never calls or comes around... 
 Step off the platform and onto the train 
 Look out your window and into the rain 
 Watch all the buildings that pass as you ride 
 And count all the stories that go on inside 
 And then ask yourself if it must be this way 
 Should walls and doors and plaster ceilings 
 Separate us from each others' feelings?'Round and 'round, the years go 'round and 'round 
 And many a dream is lost in the nasty city sound... 
 Now she's down and out, everyone's above her 
 Tried everything a gal could try 
 She takes the notion that nobody loves her 
 And here's the reason why: 
 She came to the city like a good gal should 
 Found a little pad in a bad neighborhood 
 She learned about life and it was quite a shock 
 But now she knocks 'em down with the best on the block 
 Ah, right! 
 Yeah, and it's really a shame too, 
 'Cause she was her daddy's pride and joy 
 Daddy, won't you buy that pretty dolly for me? 
 It's the only toy I ever wanted 
 Won't you take me for a walk in the park? 
 I love the big brass band 
 And the chestnut stand 
 And that sad old man 
 'Round and 'round, the years go 'round and 'round 
 And many a dream is lost in the nasty city sound... 
 Now she's down and out, everyone's above her 
 Tried everything a gal could try 
 She takes the notion that nobody loves her 
 Oh, but she's wrong, you know, 
 Because I love herShow the world and all its people 
 All the wonders love can bring 
 Give us strength and understanding 
 Give us all one song to sing 
 Let the music play 
 Play it loud and make it clear 
 It's time to stand up 
 To a new world that is now so near 
 From the bottom to the top 
 To the leaders of the land 
 We all have one heart 
 Everyone of us must lend a hand 
 And let there be joy in the world 
 And let there be no sorrow 
 (Let there be) 
 And let there be peace on earth 
 And let there be peace on earth 
 For all the world 
 We've got to see 
 That love, oh love 
 What a blessed thing (oh, yeah) 
 Say it loud 
 Make it clear today 
 All the walls are falling down 
 No more children off to war 
 If we search in our hearts 
 All the suffering will be no more 
 And let there be joy in the world 
 And let there be no sorrow 
 For all god's children 
 Let them see 
 That love, oh love 
 What a blessed thing (oh, yeah) 
 Say it loud 
 Make it clear today 
 And freedom, no more lies 
 We can save this world if we try 
 One world I know we can make it 
 Yes, it's only in your heart 
 Yes, it's only in your dreams 
 You can climb the highest mountains 
 You can make the whole world sing 
 Love, oh love 
 What a blessed thing (oh, yeah) 
 Say it loud 
 Make it clear todayHush, little baby, don't say a word. 
 Mama's gonna buy you a mockingbird 
 And if that mockingbird won't sing, 
 Mama's gonna buy you a diamond ring 
 And if that diamond ring turns brass, 
 Mama's gonna buy you a looking glass 
 And if that looking glass gets broke, 
 Mama's gonna buy you a billy goat 
 And if that billy goat won't pull, 
 Mama's gonna buy you a cart and bull 
 And if that cart and bull turn over, 
 Mama's going to buy you a dog named Rover. 
 And if that dog named Rover won't bark, 
 Mama's going to buy you a horse and cart. 
 And if that horse and cart fall down, 
 You'll still be the sweetest little baby in town.They were married in the old Church yard 
 And they promised to be true to each other 
 No matter how hard their lives might be 
 But like meteors that fell through moments parallel 
 They were soon to cross 
 And on different plots of earth they both did fall 
 Though their lives had really not been hard at all 
 Oh my what a shame 
 No one's to blame 
 It just happened that way 
 And there's nothing you can say 
 When two people say goodbye 
 Oh my... 
 Two brothers, promised they'd return 
 When the war that they were fighting was over 
 But only one lived to keep his vow 
 And the story I was told said he lived to be quite old 
 Before time won out 
 Someone asked if he knew what they both fought for 
 But he could not recall he had ever been to war 
 Oh my what a shame 
 No one's to blame 
 It just happened that way 
 And there's nothing you can say 
 When two people say goodbye 
 Oh my... 
 For there's nothing you can say when it's over 
 And there's nothing you can do when it's done 
 There's no battle you can win 
 And there's nothing to begin 
 That's not begun 
 On this moment, I recall your face 
 And I wonder if you still think about me 
 Occasionally I still think of you 
 And I watch the river flow and I know I must let go 
 But it's oh so hard 
 For the waves are all around my small canoe 
 I had always hoped this boat could carry two 
 Oh my what a shame 
 No one's to blame 
 It just happened that way 
 And there's nothing you can say 
 When two people say goodbye 
 Oh my...I feel like a spinning top or a dreidel 
 The spinning don't stop when you leave the cradle 
 You just slow down 
 Round and around this world you go 
 Spinning through the lives of the people you know 
 We all slow down 
 How you gonna keep on turning from day to day? 
 How you gonna keep from turning your life away? 
 No days you can borrow, no time you can buy 
 No trust in tomorrow, it's a lie 
 I feel like a spinning top or a dreidel 
 The spinning don't stop when you leave the cradle 
 You just slow down 
 Round and around this world you go 
 Spinning through the lives of the people you know 
 We all slow down 
 How you gonna keep on turning from day to day? 
 How you gonna keep from turning your life away? 
 And I feel like I'm dippin' and divin' 
 My sky shoes are spiked with lead heels 
 I'm lost in this star car I'm drivin' 
 But my air sole keeps pushin' big wheels 
 My world is a constant confusion 
 My mind is prepared to attack 
 My past, a persuasive illusion 
 I'm watchin' the future it's black 
 What do you know? 
 You know just what you perceive 
 What can you show? 
 Nothing of what you believe 
 And as you grow 
 Each thread of life that you leave 
 Will spin around your deeds and dictate your needs 
 As you sell your soul and you sow your seeds 
 And you wound yourself and your loved one bleeds 
 And your habits grow, and your conscience feeds 
 On all that you thought you should be 
 I never thought this could happen to me 
 I feel like a spinning top or a dreidel 
 The spinning don't stop when you leave the cradle 
 You just slow down 
 Round and around this world you go 
 Spinning through the lives of the people you know 
 We all slow down 
 How you gonna keep on turning from day to day? 
 How you gonna keep from turning your life away? Oh... 
 I feel like a spinning top or a dreidel 
 The spinning don't stop when you leave the cradle 
 You just slow down 
 You just slow down 
 You just 
 Slow 
 DownWell, I got crazy yesterday and I called her to say 
 Please baby won't you come home tonight 
 I can't even trust my brain to get my heart in from the rain 
 I know that girl's a hurricane, in her own right 
 Then early this mornin' after she was goin' 
 I sat there in my chair all alone 
 Well I called my friend cryin', and asked him why 
 That girl was always doing me so wrong 
 He said: "When the gates are all down and the signals are flashin' 
 The whistle is screamin' in vain 
 And you stay on the tracks, ignoring the facts 
 Well, you can't blame the wreck on the train 
 No, you can't blame the wreck on the train" 
 Well, how many times have I promised myself 
 Not to do the same thing as before 
 I swear I will leave it alone and believe it 
 Then I'll turn around and do it some more 
 Oh, fool me one time and it's shame on you 
 Fool me twice and it's shame on me 
 That's what my best friend warned me when I called him this mornin' 
 Then he reminded me 
 He said: "When the gates are all down and the signals are flashin' 
 The whistle is screamin' in vain 
 And you stay on the tracks, ignoring the facts 
 Well, you can't blame the wreck on the train 
 No, you can't blame the wreck on the train" 
 He said: "When the gates are all down and the signals are flashin' 
 And the whistle is screamin' in vain 
 And you stay on the tracks, ignoring the facts 
 Well, you can't blame the wreck on the train 
 No, you can't blame the wreck on the train 
 Man, you gotta quit blamin' the train"Love hurts, love scars, love wounds and mars 
 Any heart not tough or strong enough 
 To take a lot of pain, take a lot of pain 
 Love is like a cloud, it holds a lot of rain 
 Love hurts, ooh-ooh, love hurts 
 I'm young, I know, but even so 
 I know a thing or two I learned from you 
 I really learned a lot, really learned a lot 
 Love is like a flame, it burns you when it's hot 
 Love hurts, ooh-ooh, love hurts 
 Some fools think of happiness, blissfulness, togetherness 
 Some fools fool themselves, I guess, they're not foolin' me 
 I know it isn't true, I know it isn't true 
 Love is just a lie made to make you blue 
 Love hurts, ooh-ooh, love hurts, ooh-ooh, love hurtsDon't know much about history 
 Don't know much biology 
 Don't know much about a science book, 
 Don't know much about the French I took. 
 But I do know that I love you, 
 And I know that if you love me, too, 
 What a wonderful world this would be. 
 Don't know much about geography, 
 Don't know much trigonometry. 
 Don't know much about algebra, 
 Don't know what a slide rule is for. 
 But I do know that one and one is two, 
 And if this one could be with you, 
 What a wonderful world this would be. 
 Now, I don't claim to be an "A" student, 
 But I'm tryin' to be. 
 For maybe by being an "A" student, baby, 
 I can win your love for me. 
 Don't know much about history, 
 Don't know much biology. 
 Don't know much about a science book, 
 Don't know much about the French I took. 
 But I do know that I love you, 
 And I know that if you love me, too, 
 What a wonderful world this would be. 
 History 
 Biology 
 Science book 
 French I took. 
 But I do know that I love you, 
 And I know that if you love me, too, 
 What a wonderful world this would beIn the beginning there was nothingness and God but waved his hand 
 And from the endless void there sprang the beauty of the land 
 And high above the canyon walls the diamond stars were new 
 And breezes blew from nothingness and herbs and grasses grew 
 And silent creatures roamed the Earth and multiplied their kind 
 And man was but a molecule that God had left behind. 
 We have grown we have grown, we have captured the throne 
 Of the kingdom God made for our winning. 
 We have grown we have grown, but our children alone 
 Have so little time left for beginning. 
 And mountains sprang and chaos rang the overture of life 
 And rivers coursed the twisted blade of natures sharpest knife 
 And cut beneath the rolling dales a gateway to the sea 
 While tidal waves and mighty gales were heard in symphony 
 And sunshine fell upon the waves and warmed the virgin land 
 And from the mud a drop of blood was left upon the sand. 
 We have grown we have grown, we have captured the throne 
 Of the kingdom God made for our winning. 
 We have grown we have grown, but our children alone 
 Have so little time left for beginning. 
 And eagles flew from craggy peaks above the garden wall. 
 The drop of blood became a man, the tree of life grew tall. 
 And perfect in his loneliness, a rib pulled from his chest 
 Formed a sweet companion of pulchritude and breast. 
 And from the tree of knowledge God said they could not eat. 
 And perfect was their paradise unto the serpent at their feet. 
 We have grown we have grown, we have captured the throne 
 Of the kingdom God made for our winning. 
 We have grown we have grown, but our children alone 
 Have so little time left for beginning. 
 Tree of knowledge, tree of death, upon the ground they trod. 
 The serpent said your eye's will see and ye will be a god. 
 Defy the word and eat the fruit and ye will never die 
 And you will chart your destiny and rule the Earth and sky. 
 And man was banished east of Eden. See what we have lost. 
 For though the father sets the price, the children pay the cost. 
 We have grown we have grown, we have captured the throne 
 Of the kingdom God made for our winning. 
 We have grown we have grown, but our children alone 
 Have so little time left for beginning.Windows in a silent room, 
 Sunlight burns the walls to black. 
 Angles and dimensions melt 
 While colors drip and pillows crack- 
 Reflections of my memories like pictures pasted on a sheet, 
 A ribbon film of separate frames 
 Lying curled up at my feet. 
 The film is just a snake-design 
 And the photographs are fading fast... 
 These are not memories of mine- 
 I have no future... no past... 
 I have seen a thousand afternoons 
 Dissolve into the night. 
 Like sugar crystals on a spoon 
 They disappear from sight. 
 Grey days from the crispest morning 
 To the warmest afternoon... 
 In this room. 
 And I like to draw 
 The face I saw so long ago. 
 My image in the mirror tells the jagged lines 
 Which way to go. 
 A black-and-white description of 
 The sole survivor of the Holocaust... 
 All the rest were lost. 
 Do you see this paper face? 
 It has no color or no mood. 
 My eyes are ageless as am I! 
 I need no sleep, I need no food. 
 I am a king! But like a child, 
 The other children laugh at me... 
 Tongues of fire wagging wild, 
 They dance around me merrily. 
 I'll kill them all, 
 And if I fail, 
 I'll kill whoever I can find. 
 Then they'll beg me to be kind. 
 My eyes have seen far more 
 Than eyes can ever tell: 
 This planet plunged through mushroom fires 
 Of earthly hell. 
 I know that my sweet Jesus said He would return... 
 But Babylon has fallen, 
 And the cities... 
 Burn.The lonesome sight of a train going by 
 Makes me wanna stop and cry 
 Oh, I recall the day they took you away 
 I'm blue, I'm lonesome too 
 And when I hear that lonesome whistle blow 
 I want to pack my trunk and go 
 Oh, the lonesome sight of a train going by 
 Makes me want to stop and cry 
 And when I hear that lonesome whistle blow 
 I want to pack my trunk and go 
 Oh, the lonesome sight of a train going by 
 Makes me want to stop and cryWell you better jump, jump, jump, 
 If you wanna' live at all. 
 Yes you better jump, jump, jump, 
 Even though you're bound to fall 
 Cause' they're gonna' make you sorry gonna' make you cry 
 If you don't jump, jump, jump, into the seat by and by. 
 Well, you jump for joy and happiness, 
 You jump when things go right. 
 You jump when you're asleep 
 And you hear a strange voice in the night. 
 Sometimes we get to use to things, they don't mean what they did. 
 I know that what make my floor, make another fellows lid. 
 Well you better jump, jump, jump, 
 If you wanna' live at all. 
 Yes you better jump, jump, jump, 
 Even though you're bound to fall 
 Cause' they're gonna' make you sorry gonna' make you cry 
 If you don't jump, jump, jump, into the seat by and by. 
 Well, I'm always on the lookout, 
 For somethin' fresh and new. 
 Like bein' on a cookout with a crazy Kangaroo. 
 Just when I think I've found a place where I'm sure I wanna' stop. 
 My body won't quit cookin' and my mind begins to hop. 
 Well you better jump, jump, jump, 
 If you wanna' live at all. 
 Yes you better jump, jump, jump, 
 Even though you're bound to fall 
 Cause' they're gonna' make you sorry gonna' make you cry 
 If you don't jump, jump, jump, into the seat by and by. 
 Well, I'm thinkin' about a thousand things, 
 I'm a losin' lots of sleep. 
 I'm glidin' on my inner wings, I'm gettin' set to leap. 
 I'm ridin' on my pony, I'm lettin' out my rope. 
 I'm lookin' for an idea that a big bar of soap. 
 Well you better jump, jump, jump, 
 If you wanna' live at all. 
 Yes you better jump, jump, jump, 
 Even though you're bound to fall 
 Cause' they're gonna' make you sorry gonna' make you cry 
 If you don't jump, jump, jump, into the seat by and by. 
 Well you better jump, jump, jump, 
 If you wanna' live at all. 
 Yes you better jump, jump, jump, 
 Even though you're bound to fall 
 Cause' they're gonna' make you sorry gonna' make you cry 
 If you don't jump, jump, jump, into the seat by and by. 
 Well, one man was cold and hungry, 
 One man was rich and well. 
 One man stood at the window, as the crowd began to yell. 
 While the poor man prayed to Jesus and the rich man made a deal. 
 One man was standing naked yellin' do what you feel. 
 Well you better jump, jump, jump, 
 If you wanna' live at all. 
 Yes you better jump, jump, jump, 
 Even though you're bound to fall 
 Cause' they're gonna' make you sorry gonna' make you cry 
 If you don't jump, jump, jump, into the seat by and by.Happy trails to you, until we meet again. 
 Happy trails to you, keep smilin' until then. 
 Who cares about the clouds when we're together? 
 Just sing a song and bring the sunny weather. 
 Happy trails to you, till we meet again. 
 Some trails are happy ones, 
 Others are blue. 
 It's the way you ride the trail that counts, 
 Here's a happy one for you. 
 Happy trails to you, until we meet again. 
 Happy trails to you, keep smilin' until then. 
 Who cares about the clouds when we're together? 
 Just sing a song and bring the sunny weather. 
 Happy trails to you, till we meet againA long, long time ago 
 I can still remember how that music used to make me smile 
 And I knew if I had my chance 
 That I could make those people dance 
 And maybe they'd be happy for a while 
 But February made me shiver 
 With every paper I'd deliver 
 Bad news on the doorstep 
 I couldn't take one more step 
 I can't remember if I cried 
 When I read about his widowed bride 
 But something touched me deep inside 
 The day the music died 
 So bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 And them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 Singin' "This'll be the day that I die 
 This'll be the day that I die" 
 Did you write the book of love? 
 And do you have faith in God above? 
 If the Bible tells you so 
 Now, do you believe in rock and roll? 
 Can music save your mortal soul? 
 And can you teach me how to dance real slow? 
 Well, I know that you're in love with him 
 'Cause I saw you dancin' in the gym 
 You both kicked off your shoes 
 Man, I dig those rhythm and blues 
 I was a lonely teenage bronkin' buck 
 With a pink carnation and a pickup truck 
 But I knew I was out of luck 
 The day the music died 
 I started singin' bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 Singin' "This'll be the day that I die 
 This'll be the day that I die" 
 Now for ten years we've been on our own 
 And moss grows fat on a rollin' stone 
 But that's not how it used to be 
 When the jester sang for the king and queen 
 In a coat he borrowed from James Dean 
 And a voice that came from you and me 
 Oh, and while the king was looking down 
 The jester stole his thorny crown 
 The courtroom was adjourned 
 No verdict was returned 
 And while Lenin read a book on Marx 
 A quartet practiced in the park 
 And we sang dirges in the dark 
 The day the music died 
 We were singin' bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 Singin' "This'll be the day that I die 
 This'll be the day that I die" 
 Helter skelter in a summer swelter 
 The birds flew off with a fallout shelter 
 Eight miles high and falling fast 
 It landed foul on the grass 
 The players tried for a forward pass 
 With the jester on the sidelines in a cast 
 Now the halftime air was sweet perfume 
 While the sergeants played a marching tune 
 We all got up to dance 
 Oh, but we never got the chance 
 'Cause the players tried to take the field 
 The marching band refused to yield 
 Do you recall what was revealed 
 The day the music died? 
 We started singin' bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 And singin' "This'll be the day that I die 
 This'll be the day that I die" 
 Oh, and there we were all in one place 
 A generation lost in space 
 With no time left to start again 
 So come on, Jack be nimble, Jack be quick 
 Jack Flash sat on a candlestick 
 'Cause fire is the devil's only friend 
 Oh, and as I watched him on the stage 
 My hands were clenched in fists of rage 
 No angel born in Hell 
 Could break that Satan's spell 
 And as the flames climbed high into the night 
 To light the sacrificial rite 
 I saw Satan laughing with delight 
 The day the music died 
 He was singin' bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 And singin' "This'll be the day that I die 
 This'll be the day that I die" 
 I met a girl who sang the blues 
 And I asked her for some happy news 
 But she just smiled and turned away 
 I went down to the sacred store 
 Where I'd heard the music years before 
 But the man there said the music wouldn't play 
 And in the streets, the children screamed 
 The lovers cried and the poets dreamed 
 But not a word was spoken 
 The church bells all were broken 
 And the three men I admire most 
 The Father, Son and the Holy Ghost 
 They caught the last train for the coast 
 The day the music died 
 And they were singin' bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 And them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 Singin' "This'll be the day that I die 
 This'll be the day that I die" 
 They were singin' bye-bye, Miss American Pie 
 Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry 
 Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey and rye 
 And singin' "This'll be the day that I die"Every thread of creation is held in position 
 By still other strands of things living 
 In an earthly tapestry hung from the skyline 
 Of smouldering cities so gray and so vulgar 
 As not to be satisfied with their own negativity 
 But needing to touch all the living as well 
 And every breeze that blows kindly is one crystal breath 
 We exhale on the blue diamond heaven 
 As gentle to touch as the hands of the healer 
 As soft as farewells whispered over the coffin 
 We're poisoned by venom with each breath we take 
 From the brown sulphur chimney and the black highway snake 
 And every dawn that breaks golden is held in suspension 
 Like the yolk of the egg in albumen 
 Where the birth and the death of unseen generations 
 Are interdependent in vast orchestration 
 And painted in colors of tapestry thread 
 When the dying are born and the living are dead 
 And every pulse of your heartbeat is one liquid moment 
 That flows through the veins of your being 
 Like a river of life flowing on since creation 
 Approaching the sea with each new generation 
 You're now just a stagnant and rancid disgrace 
 That is rapidly drowning the whole human race 
 And every fish that swims silent, every bird that flies freely 
 Every doe that steps softly 
 Every crisp leaf that falls, all the flowers that grow 
 On this colorful tapestry, somehow they know 
 That if man is allowed to destroy all we need 
 He will soon have to pay with his life, for his greedThere's no need to find a reason for your dreams 
 For there is always more to dreaming than there seems to be 
 And I'll be thankful if through out my life you dream of me 
 It's all that I could ask for while I live 
 A dream is such a lovely gift to give 
 Your fragile beauty caught me in its web 
 And I am held by every silver strand of love you spin 
 Here in a swirl of sweeping circles all my dreams begin 
 Dreams that somehow always end with you 
 You're the one that makes my dreams come true 
 Sleep is lovely when you sleep next to me 
 And while you're dreaming let your thoughts all run free 
 But if I could understand what makes you free 
 Then I would capture you and hold you for eternity 
 But I'm afraid that would destroy the love you feel for me 
 And loving you is how it has to be 
 Reasons don't mean anything to me 
 Loving you is how it has to be 
 Reasons don't mean anything to meI was a cowboy, ridin' the range 
 I got a little boy, I guess it's not strange 
 I got a little cowboy now 
 We have fun when we shoot our gun 
 He always falls to the ground 
 He rides away with a yippy-i-ay 
 And he makes that pony sound (Whinny!) 
 I was a cowboy, ridin' the range 
 I got a little boy, I guess it's not strange 
 I got a little cowboy now 
 I saw the cowboys on the TV 
 Now my little boy does just like me 
 I got a little cowboy now 
 He spins a rope and he rides at a lope 
 And he keeps his saddle dry 
 He rides away with a yippy-i-ay 
 And he makes his pony fly (Gallop sound!) 
 I was a cowboy, ridin' the range 
 I got a little boy, I guess it's not strange 
 I got a little cowboy nowThe grave that they dug him had flowers 
 Gathered from the hillsides in bright summer colours, 
 And the brown earth bleached white at the edge of his gravestone. 
 He's gone. 
 When the wars of our nation did beckon, 
 A man barely twenty did answer the calling. 
 Proud of the trust that he placed in our nation, 
 He's gone, 
 But Eternity knows him, and it knows what we've done. 
 And the rain fell like pearls on the leaves of the flowers 
 Leaving brown, muddy clay where the earth had been dry. 
 And deep in the trench he waited for hours, 
 As he held to his rifle and prayed not to die. 
 But the silence of night was shattered by fire 
 As guns and grenades blasted sharp through the air. 
 And one after another his comrades were slaughtered. 
 In morgue of Marines, alone standing there. 
 He crouched ever lower, ever lower with fear. 
 "They can't let me die! They can't let me die here! 
 I'll cover myself with the mud and the earth. 
 I'll cover myself! I know I'm not brave! 
 The earth! the earth! the earth is my grave." 
 The grave that they dug him had flowers 
 Gathered from the hillsides in bright summer colours, 
 And the brown earth bleached white at the edge of his gravestone. 
 He's gone.Take me back to my boots and saddle 
 Wooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ah-ooh 
 Let me see that general store 
 Let me ride that range once more 
 Gimme my boots and saddle 
 Let me ramble along the prairie 
 Wooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ah-ooh 
 Ropin' steers on old Bar-X 
 With my buddies, Slim and Tex 
 Oh, gimme my boots and saddle 
 Got a hankerin' to be with a banjo on my knee 
 Strummin' a pretty western tune 
 There's a gal in Cherokee 
 And she's waitin' there for me 
 Waitin' 'neath a Texas moon 
 Take me back to my boots and saddle 
 Wooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ah-ooh 
 Let me greet each blazin' morn 
 On the ranch where I was born 
 Oh, gimme my boots and saddleCrazy, I'm crazy for feeling so lonely 
 I'm crazy, crazy for feeling so blue 
 I knew you'd love me as long as you wanted 
 And then someday you'd leave me for somebody new 
 Worry, why do I let myself worry? 
 Wond'ring what in the world did I do? 
 Crazy for thinking that my love could hold you 
 I'm crazy for trying and crazy for crying 
 And I'm crazy for loving you 
 Crazy for thinking that my love could hold you 
 I'm crazy for trying and crazy for crying 
 And I'm crazy for loving youWhen evening chores are over at the ranch house on the plains 
 And there's nothing left to do but lay around 
 I saddle up my pony and go riding down the trail 
 Just to watch the desert sun go down 
 White faced cattle lowing, sagebrush everywhere 
 Granite spires are standing all around 
 I'll tell you folks it's heaven to go ridin' down the trail 
 Just to watch the desert sun go down 
 Ridin' down the canyon to watch the sun go down 
 A picture that no artist 'ere could paint 
 Cactus plants are bloomin' on the mountain side 
 I hear a coyote calling to its mate 
 When evening chores are over at the ranch house on the plains 
 And there's nothing left to do but lay around 
 I saddle up my pony and go riding down the trail 
 Just to watch the desert sun go downI feel the trembling tingle of a sleepless night 
 Creep through my fingers and the moon is bright 
 Beams of blue come flickering through my windowpane 
 Like Gypsy moths that dance around a candle flame 
 And I wonder if you know 
 That I never understood 
 That although you said you'd go 
 Until you did, I never thought you would 
 Moonlight use to bath the contours of your face 
 While chestnut hair fell all around the pillowcase 
 And the fragrance of your flowers rest beneath my head 
 A sympathy bouquet left with the love that's dead 
 And I wonder if you know 
 That I never understood 
 That although you said you'd go 
 Until you did, I never thought you would 
 Never thought the words you said were true 
 Never thought you said just what you meant 
 Never knew how much I needed you 
 Never thought you'd leave, until you went 
 Morning comes and morning goes with no regret 
 And evening brings the memories I can't forget 
 Empty rooms that echo as I climb the stairs 
 And empty clothes that drape and fall on empty chairs 
 And I wonder if you know 
 That I never understood 
 That although you said you'd go 
 Until you did, I never thought you wouldIn the night, while you lay sleeping 
 Dreaming of your amber skies 
 Was a poor boy broken hearted 
 Listening to the winds that sigh 
 My little darling, oh how, I love you 
 How I love you, none can tell 
 In your heart you love another 
 Little darling, pal of mine 
 Many a day, with you I've rambled 
 Happiest hours, with you I've spent 
 For I had your heart forever 
 But I find it's only lent 
 There is just three things I wish for 
 That's my casket, shroud and grave 
 When I'm dead, don't weep for me 
 Just like those lips that you betrayedI looked through every barroom 
 And I searched from coast to coast 
 You were scarce as low-cost housing 
 Baby when I needed you most 
 And where were you baby, when my heart went out? 
 You left me ba by, in all this darkness and doubt 
 Now I peeked through fancy boudoirs 
 And I peeked through window grates 
 I only saw Republicans, romancing Southern states 
 And where were you baby, when my heart went out? 
 You left me ba by, in all this darkness and doubt 
 Now I tried to replace you with a streetwalker named Desire 
 But prices up so high, hell I couldn't afford to try her 
 It takes you my baby, baby, baby - to put my body out 
 You left me baby, in all this darkness and doubt 
 But tonight I think I'm gonna take some good advice 
 I'm gonna look around and find somebody that's a really nice 
 Well perhaps a banker's daughter and if her Papa's a cuss 
 Well I hope to do to her what her Papa does to us 
 And we'll have fancy shack and a fancy Cadillac 
 And she'll be studying to be, a nymphomaniac 
 And we'll have a little rye and we'll play a little gin 
 We'll have another rye and we'll play another gin 
 And then we'll have another rye just to get a little glow 
 Have another rye just to make the conversation flow 
 And then we'll have another rye and we'll play a little gin 
 We'll have another rye and we'll tune some music in 
 And then we'll have another gin... and we'll play a little rye... 
 And we'll suddenly realize that we're getting kind of high 
 And so we'll turn the lights down low... to keep the bulbs from getting hot 
 And we'll play a little game called ... "Yes?"..."No!" ... 
 Why not? 
 But tonight I think I'm gonna find me something swell 
 So I can wake up in the morning... miserable as hell 
 Now when butter costs a dollar, bread costs more than cake 
 Come back soon cause, babe, think of what a gal like you could make 
 Yes come back baby, baby, baby - don't ever say that we're through 
 'Cause this time, pretty baby... I'd like to walk right out on you!It's a wonderful night and the music is right 
 Will you dance with me and hold me tight 
 I don't know why I feel this way 
 It's how I feel when they start to play 
 That old song we heard so long ago 
 That I wonder if I can remember every word 
 It's amazing how fast years have gone past 
 And that some kinds of love just don't seem to last 
 But win or loose, I love you still 
 It's you I choose and I always will 
 And that old song we heard so long ago 
 Still reminds me of the girl I used to know 
 But that's all in a dream that's been over for years 
 Now things are what they seem, only minus the tears 
 So, I think of you now the way you were then 
 And I'll manage somehow to keep trying again 
 But I don't mind if you don't write 
 'Cause I recall that magic night 
 And that old song we heard so long ago 
 Was more beautiful than the love we used to share 
 Yes, that old song we heard so long ago 
 Was more beautiful than the love we used to share 
 Yes that old song ...Take a look at this little girl. Prettiest in this little world. 
 Got a little twist and curl. 
 And she calls me Daddy-O. And she calls me Daddy-O. 
 Take a look at this little smile. Cutest one I've seen in a while. 
 Got a lot of class and style. 
 And she calls me Daddy-O. And she calls me Daddy-O. 
 Oh, oh, oh, got a funny feelin'. Oh, oh, oh, it's my heart she's stealin'. 
 Oh, oh, oh, she is so appealin'. 
 When she calls me Daddy-O. When she calls me Daddy-O. 
 She can make the Earth stand still. She can reach the window sill. 
 She can give my heart a thrill. 
 When she calls me Daddy-O. When she calls me Daddy-O. 
 Oh, oh, oh, got a funny feelin'. Oh, oh, oh, it's my heart she's stealin'. 
 Oh, oh, oh, she is so appealin'. 
 When she calls me Daddy-O. When she calls me Daddy-O. 
 Take a look at silk and lace. Take a look at this little face. 
 When she's in her dad's embrace. 
 And she calls me Daddy-O. And she calls me Daddy-O. 
 Oh, oh, oh, got a funny feelin'. Oh, oh, oh, it's my heart she's stealin'. 
 Oh, oh, oh, she is so appealin'. 
 When she calls me Daddy-O. When she calls me Daddy-O. 
 Oh, oh, oh. Oh, oh, oh. 
 Oh, oh, oh. Oh, oh, ohEveryday 
 It's getting closer, going faster 
 Than a rollercoaster 
 Love like your's 
 Will surely come my way 
 Ahey ahey hey 
 Everyday 
 It's getting faster 
 Everyone said: 
 "Go on and ask her, 
 Love like your's will surely come my way" 
 Ahey ahey hey 
 Everyday 
 Seems a little longer 
 Everyway 
 Love's a little stronger 
 Come with me 
 Do you ever long for true love from me? 
 Everyday 
 It's getting closer, going faster 
 Than a rollercoaster 
 Love like your's 
 Will surely come my way 
 Ahey ahey hey 
 Love like your's 
 Will surely come my wayStandin' on a trap door, there's a hole in the ground. 
 Underneath the door there's a hole and it goes to infinity. 
 Standin' on a dark street, there's a light in the sky. 
 Followin' the light through the night as it goes to infinity. 
 How can I avoid infinity? How have I annoyed infinity? 
 I'm movin' slow in infinity. I even glow in infinity. 
 It's hard being' small, (hard bein' small) 
 Shrinkin' into space, (shrinkin' into space) 
 The world is just a ball, (world is just a ball) 
 It was my favorite place (it was my favorites place) 
 Lookin' for the blue skies, watchin' for the sunrise. 
 One thing you can bet, you won't see it set in infinity. 
 Gonna take a light beam, on the wings of the Jet Stream. 
 Gonna take my place in the infinite space of infinity. 
 How can I be friends with infinity? Can I make ammends with infinity? 
 How can I complain to infinity? What'll I explain to infinity? 
 It's hard being' small, (hard bein' small) 
 Shrinkin' into space, (shrinkin' into space) 
 The world is just a ball, (world is just a ball) 
 It was my favorite place (it was my favorites place) 
 Give me just a time shield before the world has it's fate sealed. 
 Protect me for a while before they turn my dial to infinity. 
 I hope I can contribute, oh, but I don't want a tribute. 
 Hypocrites will come and say somethin' really dumb in infinity. 
 I can't hear you sing in infinity. I can't change a thing in infinity. 
 The absence of light in infinity gives me a fright in infinity. 
 It's hard being' small, (hard bein' small) 
 Shrinkin' into space, (shrinkin' into space) 
 The world is just a ball, (world is just a ball) 
 It was my favorite place (it was my favorites place)Just walk on out the door, it's all over 
 Forgivin' you is just a waste of time 
 I don't believe that I'll live to regret it 
 You're ancient history to this heart of mine 
 So many times I've heard the same old stories 
 Why, any fool can learn to read between the lines 
 But this time, honey, you've burned all your bridges 
 You're ancient history to this heart of mine 
 Well I've marked you down as just another lonely page 
 In the book of heartaches that you leave behind 
 'Cause I've found out I'm better off without you 
 You're ancient history to this heart of mine 
 Well I've marked you down as just another lonely page 
 In the book of heartaches that you leave behind 
 'Cause I've found out I'm better off without you 
 You're ancient history to this heart of mine 
 You're ancient history to this heart of mineI'm walkin' away, and leavin' you standin' 
 I've nothing to say, for I've said it all the best way I know how 
 Cry, cry if you need to, but I can't stay to watch you 
 'Cause that's the wrong thing to do. 
 Does it ease you to know, that I've thought about stayin' 
 Yet I think I will go, and let the words of goodbye go unsaid 
 Speak, speak if you need to, but I can't stay to hear you 
 'Cause that's the wrong thing to do. 
 All the words that you whisper are words that have nothing to say 
 And the thoughts they reveal are the reasons I'm goin' away 
 From the touch of your voice, I can feel separation 
 So you leave me no choice, for to remain would mean living apart 
 Touch, touch if you need to, but I can't stay to hold you 
 'Cause that's the wrong thing to do. 
 That's the wrong thing to do. 
 That's the wrong thing to do.Wonderful baby livin' on love the 
 Sandman says maybe he'll take you above, 
 Up where the girls fly on ribbons and bows, where babies float by, just 
 Counting their toes. 
 Wonderful baby nothin' but new, the 
 World has gone crazy, I'm glad I'm not you. 
 At the beginning or is it the end? It goes 
 In and comes out and starts over again. 
 Wonderful baby livin' on love the 
 Sandman says maybe he'll take you above, 
 Up where the girls fly on ribbons and bows, where babies float by, just 
 Counting their toes. 
 Wonderful baby I'll watch while you grow. If 
 I knew the future you'd be first to know. But I don't know nothin' of what 
 Life's about, Just as long as you live, you'll never find out. 
 Wonderful baby, nothin' to fear. 
 Love whom you will, but doubt what you hear. 
 They'll whisper sweet things to make untrue. So be good to yourself, that's all 
 You can do. You're a wonderful baby livin' on love the sandman says maybe he'll 
 Take you above, up where the girls fly on ribbons and bows, where babies float 
 By, just counting their toes, where 
 Babies float by, just counting their toes...Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American way 
 I was ridin' on the subway in the afternoon 
 I saw some kids 'a beatin' out a funky tune 
 The lady right in front of me was old and brown 
 The kids began to push her, they knocked her down 
 I tried to help her out but there was just no way 
 A life ain't worth a damn on the street today 
 I passed the ambulance and the camera crews 
 I saw the instant replay on the evening news 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American way 
 Well will you take the car, or will you take the trip? 
 Remove annoying hair from your upper lip 
 What's it really worth? Does she really care? 
 What's the best shampoo that I can use on my hair? 
 Hey what's the real future of democracy? 
 How're we gonna streamline the bureaucracy? 
 Hey, hey, the cost of life has gone sky-high 
 Does the deodorant I'm using really keep me dry? 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American way 
 Well spin the magic wheel and try to break the bank 
 Think about your life when you fill in the blank 
 Here's a game that's real if you wanna try 
 One spot on the wheel that says you must die 
 American roulette is the game we play 
 But no-one wants to have to be the one to pay 
 You get to pass "GO", you get to pass away 
 But before we start our show, here's our sponsor to say: 
 "Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American way" 
 Well down in Mexico, the laundry's on the line 
 There's where you can go if you land on the nine 
 Canada is nice if you're fond of ice 
 If you land on the two then we'll send you there twice 
 We interrupt this game for a news release: 
 A man has gone insane and been killed by police! 
 Now back to the game, that's a dangerous play 
 'Cause if they see you in C-U-B-A you must pass away 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American way 
 My supper's on the stove, the war is on the screen 
 Pass the bread and butter while I watch the Marine 
 The shot him in the chest--Pass the chicken breast! 
 The general is saying that he's still unimpressed. 
 "We had to burn the city 'cause they wouldn't agree 
 That things go better with democracy!" 
 The weather will be fair, forget the ozone layer, 
 But strontium showers will be here and there 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American way 
 Well livin' in the country watchin' shadows fall 
 My reception ain't too good in a power stall 
 Bombers in the air, missiles in the sea 
 Chemicals in everything, including me 
 They don't keep their promise in the promised land 
 It's getting mighty hard to find an honest man 
 But coming very soon, a show you'll die to see 
 It's called "The End Of The World", on channel "C" 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime time 
 This is livin' in the U. S. A. 
 Well this is life, this is Prime Time 
 This is livin' the American wayMornin', Mrs. Campbell 
 Lovely day today 
 I heard about the fire 
 I wonder what the papers say 
 Let's see now: 
 Give me fifty shotgun shells 
 And a hundred feet of rope 
 Just add that to my bill 
 Says here there ain't no hope 
 They all were burned alive 
 And four packs of cigarettes 
 No, I think I'll make it five 
 I heard about the wedding 
 I'm so happy for the bride 
 Why that fire house looked mighty nice 
 And the whole town swelled with pride 
 We've watched her grow to womanhood 
 She's found an upright man 
 She'll learn this life ain't easy 
 You do the best you can 
 No, no, my family ain't so good 
 My wife just had a spell 
 And I can't afford the medicine 
 She needs to make her well 
 I've been laid off at that factory 
 For sixteen months or more 
 I came home last Wednesday evenin' 
 I found her lyin' on the floor 
 Bye now, Mrs. Campbell 
 Say howdy to your son 
 You can tell him we'll go huntin' 
 When he gets a bigger gun 
 It was too bad about that fire 
 But don't you get me wrong 
 We've gotta teach these people 
 How to stay where they belongLove letters straight from your heart 
 Keep us so near while apart 
 I'm not alone in the night 
 When I can have all the love you write 
 I memorize ev'ry line 
 I kiss the name that you sign 
 And darlin', then I read again right from the start 
 Love letters straight from your heartIf you wanna make me happy 
 Here's all you gotta do 
 Just take me where you're going 
 And I'll take care of you 
 'Cause I've got this need that's growin' 
 To keep you satisfied 
 And if you keep your green light showin' 
 Then you can take me for a ride 
 'Cause I la la la la la la love you 
 And I la la la la la la care 
 And I really want you with me baby, everywhere 
 Well I like the way you're movin' 
 And I like the way you go 
 Well I like the way you let your 
 Locomotion show 
 'Cause my drivin' wheel is drivin' 
 And my pistons are workin' good 
 And if your motor gives you some trouble, baby 
 I'll take a look underneath your hood 
 'Cause I la la la la la la love you 
 And I la la la la la la care 
 And I really want you with me baby, everywhere 
 Well, I know you like your transportation 
 With a motor and a rubber wheel 
 But when you move you cause a transformation 
 In this lover and the way I feel 
 So if you wanna make me happy 
 Here's all you gotta do 
 Just let me ride your box car 
 And I'll hobo with you 
 'Cause all I got is on my shoulders 
 I'm walkin' on my travellin' shoes 
 And before I get much older 
 I'm gonna kick these lovesick blues 
 And I la la la la la la love you 
 And I la la la la la la care 
 And I really want you with me baby, everywhereI was all right for a while 
 I could smile for a while 
 But when I saw you last night 
 You held my hand so tight 
 When you stopped to say 'hello' 
 And though you wished to me well 
 You couldn't tell 
 That I'd been 
 Crying, over you 
 Crying, over you 
 Then you said so long 
 Left me standing all alone 
 Alone and crying. 
 Crying 
 Crying 
 Crying 
 It's hard to understand 
 That the touch of your hand 
 Can start me crying 
 I thought that I, was over you 
 But it's true, so true 
 I love you even more, than I did before 
 But, darling, what can I do 
 While you don't love me 
 And I'll always be 
 Crying, over you 
 Crying, over you 
 Yes, now you're gone 
 And from this moment on 
 I'll be crying 
 (Crying) 
 Crying 
 (Crying) 
 Crying 
 (Crying) 
 Crying over you 
 Over you 
 Over youNarcisissma, Narcisissma is the pride of Pomona, 
 Pomona, Pomona says she looks like me. 
 But she will look like you when I'm set free. 
 Narcisissma, Narcisissma is the belle of Biloxi, 
 Biloxi, Biloxi says she's not your kind 
 But Narcisissma gives me peace of mind. 
 She's got no braids in the inkwell, no money on the prize. 
 Ain't got no boyfriend behind her that she can't hypnotize. 
 And if you wanna see yourself without delusions or delies. 
 All you do is just look into her eyes. 
 Narcisissma, Narcisissma has no pride or delusions, 
 Delusions, delusions make me turn my face 
 But Narcisissma let's me find my place. 
 She's got no grudges, no crutches, no pigment and no peeves. 
 No cryers, no pliers, no liars and no sleeves. 
 And she will always tell you every thing that she believes. 
 She's got no belly button too, no high heeled shoe. 
 Narcisissma, Narcisissma is the pride of Pomona, 
 Pomona, Pomona says she looks like me. 
 But she will look like you when I'm set free. 
 Well everybody's lookin' like they're s'posed to 
 But nobody's lookin' very good. 
 So when you find somebody to get close to 
 Well don't you think you should? 
 Narcisissma, Narcisissma loves to thrill and delight me, 
 Delight me, delight me and I'll never quit 
 'Cause Narcisissma knows just where I fit. 
 She's got no tight draws, locked doors, nothin' on the side. 
 Ain't got no skin flaws, in-laws, nothin' left to hide. 
 And if you need a new location where you'll best be satisfied 
 You might prefer, to fall in love with her 
 Narcisissma, Narcisissma is the pride of Pomona, 
 Pomona, says she looks like me. 
 But she will look like you when I'm set free.What can this be, can you tell me? 
 Would you like to discover why we're not free? 
 To be lovers 
 I've been wanting to ask you 
 Where has all the love gone 
 And what have we become 
 Storm clouds full of thunder 
 Move silent as they drum 
 And when they're gone 
 We'll be fine, till tomorrow 
 Though I hope it won't rain 
 You will be mine 
 And my sorrow 
 Will take wings in the morning 
 High above the heavens 
 A rainbow paints the sky 
 White doves sing their songs of love 
 I watch them as they fly 
 And wonder what can this be 
 Can you tell me? 
 Would you like to discover why we're not free? 
 To be loversDon't worry 'bout me, it's all over now 
 Though I may be blue, I'll manage somehow. 
 Love can't be explained, can't be controlled 
 One day it's warm, next day it's cold. 
 Don't pity me, 'cause I'm feeling blue 
 Don't be ashamed it might happen to you. 
 Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, love, kiss me 
 One time then go love, I'll understand 
 Don't worry 'bout me. 
 Sweet, sweet, sweet, love will I want you to be 
 As happy as I when you love me 
 I'll never forget you your sweet memory it's all over now Don't worry 'bout me. 
 When one heart tells one heart, one heart goodbye 
 One heart is free, one heart will cry 
 Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh sweet, sweet baby, sweet baby, sweet 
 It's all right don't worry 'bout meWell I've been left for dead on the road of love. 
 I was doin' high speed with a load of love 
 Forgot the first creed in the code of love. 
 All's fair in love and war. 
 Well I'm an honest man and I try to be true. 
 I did unto her like I'll do unto you. 
 Now you prefer to tell me we're through. 
 I'm bleedin' through my shirt and tie. 
 I'm bleedin' and I'll tell you why. 
 Well I've been left for dead on the road of love. 
 I was doin' high speed with a load of love 
 Forgot the first creed in the code of love. 
 All's fair in love and war. 
 Well now who is the guy and when did he come? 
 When did he start to go beatin' your drum? 
 Well he's hittin' on you. I'm feelin' numb 
 And she don't believe a word I told her. 
 I'm cryin' on a gravel shoulder. 
 Well I've been left for dead on the road of love. 
 I was doin' high speed with a load of love 
 Forgot the first creed in the code of love. 
 All's fair in love and war. 
 Watch what you're doin'. 
 Look where you're goin'. 
 Give me a signal. 
 Some way of knowin'. 
 Well now who's at the wheel in the life that drove by. 
 I could swear it was her made me shift into high. 
 She's got those dangerous curves 
 And they're wrackin' my nerves 
 She always wiggles and swerves. 
 She's gonna give her driver everything he deserves. 
 Well now who could want this to lie here alone 
 With a palate of bricks, a pillow of stone. 
 Well to think that one kiss pulled me out o' my zone 
 And I wonder what's the change inside her? 
 This road has got a long divider. 
 Well I've been left for dead on the road of love. 
 I was doin' high speed with a load of love 
 Forgot the first creed in the code of love. 
 All's fair in love and war. 
 All's fair in love and war. 
 All's fair in love and warI'm in love, 
 I'm in love, 
 I'm in love with a girl, 
 That's what's the matter with me 
 I'm in love, 
 I'm in love, with a beautiful girl, 
 But she don't give a darn about me 
 To make her love me I tried, 
 How I sighed and I cried 
 But she just refused 
 And ever since she's gone away, 
 I've got those lovesick blues 
 Got the feeling called the "blue hoo's," 
 Since my sweetie said "Good Bye" 
 Seems I don't know what to "Do Hoo" 
 All day long I sit and cry 
 That last long day we spent alone 
 I'm yearning for it yet 
 She thrilled me, filled me, 
 With a kind of lovin', 
 I never will forget, the way she called me sweet daddy" 
 Twas just a beautiful dream 
 I hate to think that it's all over I lost my heart it seems 
 I got so used to her somehow 
 But I'm no body's baby 
 Now, gee it's awful when you're lonesome 
 And get those lovesick blue-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh's 
 Got the feeling called the "blue hoo's," 
 Since my sweetie said "Good Bye" 
 Seems I don't know what to "Do Hoo" 
 All day long I sit and cry 
 That last long day we spent alone 
 I'm yearning for it yet 
 She thrilled me, filled me, 
 With a kind of lovin', 
 I never will forget, the way she called me sweet daddy 
 Twas just a beautiful dream 
 I hate to think that it's all over I lost my heart it seems 
 I got so used to her somehow 
 But I'm no body's baby 
 Now, gee it's awful when you're lonesome 
 And get those lovesick blue-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh'sOh, Mary, this London's a wonderful sight 
 With people here working by day and by night 
 They don't sow potatoes nor barley nor wheat 
 But there's gangs of them diggin' for gold in the street 
 At least when I asked them, that's what I was told 
 So I just took a hand at this diggin' for gold 
 But for all that I've found there, I might as well be 
 In the place where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the sea 
 I believe that when writin' a wish you expressed 
 As to how the fine ladies of London were dressed 
 But if you'll believe me, when asked to a ball 
 They don't wear no tops to their dresses at all 
 Oh, I've seen them myself and you could not in truth 
 Tell if they were bound for a ball or a bath 
 Don't be startin' them fashions now, Mary McRee, 
 In the place where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the sea 
 There's beautiful girls here, oh, never you mind 
 Beautiful shapes Nature never designed 
 Lovely complexions of roses and cream 
 But let me remark with regard to the same 
 That if at those roses you venture to sit 
 The colors might all come away on your lip 
 So I'll wait for the wild rose that's waitin' for me 
 In the place where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the sea 
 You remember young Diddy McClaren, of course 
 But he's over here with the rest of the force 
 I saw him one day as he stood on the strand 
 Stopped all the traffic with a wave of his hand 
 As we were talking of days that are gone 
 The whole town of London stood there to look on 
 But for all his great powers, he's wishful like me 
 To be back where the dark Mourne sweeps down to the seaI need headroom, 
 Got to have headroom, 
 Some place to rest my head. 
 I'm gettin' taller, 
 Thinkin's gettin' smaller, 
 Time is winnin' out instead. 
 Well, I heard it on the news, 
 They're selling everything they can. 
 And the American flag 
 Is manufactured in Japan. 
 They're fightin' battles in the stars, 
 They're pourin' billions into Mars. 
 And layin' right there at my feet, 
 There're people sleepin' in the street. 
 Give me room, room, room, room, room, room. 
 Well, I'm livin' on the farm, 
 Where chemistry has lost its charm. 
 And every dusty wind that blows, 
 Is burnin' big holes in my clothes. 
 They're burnin' big holes in the sky, 
 Makin' people wonder why 
 With all our land and sea and space, 
 Progress is wreckin' every place. 
 Give me room, room, room, room, room, room. 
 Well, if you want an assen-ell, 
 The government will wish you well, 
 And if you steal a million bucks, 
 The government will wish you luck. 
 And they might even give you more, 
 If you're makin' things for war. 
 But if you're poor and stealin' cars, 
 You'll spend your life behind the bars. 
 Give me room, room, room, room, room, room. 
 They're talkin' ethics on the hill, 
 They're talkin' union at the mill, 
 They're talkin' justice at the farm, 
 They're talkin' safety in the car. 
 They're talkin' murder in the states, 
 They're talkin' cash to get a fix. 
 They're talkin' virus in the bed, 
 I'm talkin' room to rest my head. 
 Give me room, room, room, room, room, room. 
 I need headroom, 
 Got to have headroom, 
 Some place to rest my head.I'm always light-hearted and easy 
 Not a care in this world have I 
 Because I am loved by an Ollie 
 And I couldn't forget if I try. 
 She lives far away o'er the mountains 
 Where the little birds sing on the trees 
 And the cabin's all covered with ivy 
 And the Ollie is waiting for me. 
 The day I said goodbye to Allie 
 Is a day I will never forget 
 For the tears bubbled up from their slumber 
 I fancy I see them yet. 
 They looked like the pearls in the ocean 
 As she wept her tale of love 
 And she said my dear boy, don't forget me 
 Till we meet here again or above.Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blue 
 Wrap your presents to your darling so true 
 Pretty pencils to write, "I love you" 
 Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blue 
 Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blue 
 Wrap your presents to your darling so true 
 Pretty pencils to write, "I love you" 
 Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blue 
 Crowded street, busy feet, hustle by him 
 Downtown shoppers, Christmas is nigh 
 There he sits all alone on the sidewalk 
 Hoping you won't pass him by 
 Should you stop? You better not, you're much too busy 
 You're in a hurry, how time does fly 
 And in the distance the ringing of laughter 
 And in the midst of the laughter he cries 
 Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blue 
 Wrap your presents to your darling so true 
 Pretty pencils to write, "I love you" 
 Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blue 
 Pretty paper, pretty ribbons of blueIf I could say the things I feel, it wouldn't be the same 
 Some things are not spoken of, some things have no name 
 And though the words come hard to me I'll say them just for you 
 For this is something rare for me this feeling is so new 
 You see I love the way you love me 
 Love the way you smile at me 
 I love the way we live this life we're in 
 Long ago I heard the song that lovers sing to me 
 And through the days with each new phrase I hummed that melody 
 And all along I loved the song but I never learned it through 
 But since the day you came along, I've saved it just for you 
 You see I love the way you love me 
 Love the way you smile at me, 
 I love the way we live this life we're in 
 I don't believe in magic but I do believe in you 
 And when you say you believe in me 
 There's so much magic I can do 
 Now you see me, now you don't watch me dive below 
 Deep down in your love lake where the sweet fish come and go 
 And I might sink, and I might drown but death don't mean a thing 
 'Cause life continues right or wrong when I play this 
 Birthday song 
 I learned from you 
 And you can't even sing...Old man rhythm is in my shoes 
 No use t'sittin' and a'singin' the blues 
 So be my guest, you got nothin' to lose 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise? 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise? 
 Feel like jumpin' baby won't ya join me please 
 I don't like beggin' but I'm on bended knee 
 I got to get t'rockin' get my hat off the rack 
 I got to boogie woogie like a knife in the back 
 So be my guest, you got nothin' to lose 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise? 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise? 
 I got to get t'movin' baby I ain't lyin' 
 My heart is beatin' rhythm and it's right on time 
 So be my guest, you got nothin' to lose 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise? 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise? 
 Feel like jumpin' baby won't ya join me please 
 I don't like beggin' but I'm on bended knee 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Ooh-ee, ooh-ee baby 
 Won't ya let me take you on a sea cruise?It's a sunshine life for me 
 If I could get away from this cloud over me 
 Seems to just follow me around 
 It's a sunshine life for me 
 If I could get away from this cloud over me 
 Seems to just follow me around 
 There's a good life had for free 
 When you're out in the country 
 That's what I could use if I could get away there soon 
 It's a sunshine life for me 
 If I could get away from this cloud over me 
 Seems to just follow me around 
 There's a good life had at sea 
 If you're not in the Navy 
 That's the life for you, sail away Raymond, sail away 
 Now most folks just bore me 
 Always imposing and I'd rather meet a tree 
 Somewhere out in the cornfield 
 And it's a sunshine 
 It's a sunshine life for me 
 If I could get away from this cloud over me 
 Seems to just follow me 
 It's a sunshine life for me 
 If I could get away from this cloud over me 
 Seems to just follow me 
 It's a sunshine life for me 
 If I could get away from this cloud over me 
 Seems to just follow me around 
 It's a sunshine 
 It's a sunshine 
 It's a sunshineI walk down to the sea 
 And I saw this crazy man 
 He was looking at me 
 And he said "I have a plan" 
 Yes, he said "I have a plan" 
 He was black from the sun 
 And his eyes were in tears 
 And his hand was so thick 
 From the work of the years 
 Yes, his hand was so thick 
 From the work of the years 
 He said "Please come with me 
 To my home by the sea 
 We can smoke, drink and eat 
 And you'll sit at my feet 
 And I'll tell what I know 
 While the sea breezes blow 
 For I've tried to be free 
 But I'll soon have to go." 
 And his house was his art 
 And, nature, his wish 
 It was sculpted from clay 
 In the shape of a fish 
 It was sculpted from clay 
 In the shape for a fish 
 And the caves in the back 
 Had been arched into stone 
 And the creatures he kept 
 Made him far from alone 
 Yes, the creatures he kept 
 Made him far from alone 
 "I have only one son 
 In Chicago for life 
 He is separate from me 
 And so is my wife 
 And I live in the sun 
 And I hate what they've done 
 To my beautiful sea 
 And what they'll do to me" 
 And we walked from the house 
 For miles by the shore 
 And we picked up the trash 
 That they'd left by his door. 
 Yes, we picked up the trash 
 That they'd left by his door. 
 And the oil and the sludge 
 Got stuck to my feet 
 And the fish that were dead 
 Were too poisoned to eat. 
 Yes, the fish that were dead 
 Were too poisoned to eat. 
 And the blade cut his hand 
 And it's stiff from the scar 
 And the butchers, called doctors, 
 Leave you worse than you are 
 And we're all like the butchers 
 We cut into life 
 And we like to see blood 
 On the end of our knife. 
 And someday they will come 
 And bulldoze him down 
 For he has not a permit 
 From the kings of the town 
 No, he has not a permit 
 From the kings of the town 
 And the doctors will come 
 And say he's afraid 
 And they'll ruin this man 
 And destroy what he made 
 And the pictures he kept 
 Will be torn from his hand 
 With the beautiful house 
 That he built on the sandJust a-sittin' in the balcony 
 Just a-watchin' a movie 
 Or maybe it's a symphony 
 I wouldn't know 
 Don't care about the symphonies 
 Those cymbales and tympanies 
 Just a-sittin' in the balcony 
 On the very last row 
 I hold your hand and I kiss you, too 
 The feature's over, but we're not through! 
 Mmmm, just a-sittin' in the balcony 
 Holdin' hands in the balcony 
 Just a-sittin' in the balcony 
 On the very last row 
 We may stop lovin' to watch Bugs Bunny 
 But he can't take the place of my honey! 
 Just a-sittin' in the balcony 
 Just a-snootchin' in the balcony 
 Just a-sittin' in the balcony 
 On the very last row 
 Just a-huggin' and a-kissin' 
 With my baby in the very last rowWhen a good thing goes bad, it's not the end of the world. 
 It's the end of a world that you had with a girl. 
 Though it's hard to admit that the memory's sad 
 When you think what you had, when a good thing goes bad. 
 Love is so strange, it's a mystery to me. 
 It's easy to change and to lose what could be. 
 So you wait and you watch for the one who'll agree 
 With the things that you need and the life that you lead. 
 When a good thing goes right, it's a joy beyond worth. 
 As the roots of your love intertwine with the earth. 
 And your bodies are one, but you're living for two 
 And your future looks bright, oh yes, when a good thing goes right. 
 But time is the test, like the sea pounds the rocks. 
 And those who love best sometimes fail with the shocks. 
 And the waves break you down and you watch your love drown. 
 And she's so far from reach as you stand on the beach. 
 When a good thing goes bad, it's not the end of the world. 
 It's the end of a world that you had with a girl. 
 Though it's hard to admit that the memory's sad 
 When you think what you had, when a good thing goes bad.Here I am back home again 
 I'm here to rest 
 All they ask is where I've been 
 Knowing I've been West 
 I'm the family's unowned boy 
 Golden curls of envied hair 
 Pretty girls with faces fair 
 See the shine in the Black Sheep Boy 
 If you love me, let me live in peace 
 Please understand 
 That the black sheep can wear the golden fleece 
 And hold a winning hand 
 I'm the family's unowned boy 
 Golden curls of envied hair 
 Pretty girls with faces fair 
 See the shine in the Black Sheep Boy 
 I'm the family's unowned boy 
 Golden curls of envied hair 
 Pretty girls with faces fair 
 See the shine in the Black Sheep Boy 
 So if you love me, let me live in peace 
 Please understand 
 That the black sheep can wear the golden fleece 
 And hold a winning hand 
 I'm the family's unowned boy 
 Golden curls of envied hair 
 Pretty girls with faces fair 
 See the shine in the Black Sheep BoyJerusalem, Jerusalem all roads lead to you. 
 Jerusalem, Jerusalem your light is shining through. 
 And you will show, show the way, to all who see it shine, 
 That we can live, in peace, in Jerusalem this time. 
 The walls will keep you in, the walls will keep you out. 
 The gates are calling those, who know what it's about. 
 Jerusalem, Jerusalem all roads lead to you. 
 Jerusalem, Jerusalem your light is shining through. 
 And you will show (you will show), show the way (show the way), to all who see it shine, 
 That we can live, in peace, in Jerusalem this time. 
 Jerusalem is old, Jerusalem is new, 
 Jerusalem can hold, Moslem, Christian, Jew. 
 In Jerusalem, Jerusalem all roads lead to you. 
 Jerusalem, Jerusalem your light is shining through. 
 And you will show (you will show), show the way (show the way), to all who see it shine, 
 That we can live, in peace, in Jerusalem this time. 
 The markets and the alleys, the temples and the tombs. 
 A place for all believers, it has so many rooms. 
 In Jerusalem, Jerusalem all roads lead to you. 
 Jerusalem, Jerusalem your light is shining through. 
 And you will show (you will show), show the way (show the way), to all who see it shine, 
 That we can live, in peace, in Jerusalem this time. 
 Yes, we can live, in peace, in Jerusalem this time.In someone's hand there is a land, where I must surely go, where she is 
 To learn what she must know, when she gives all her love away 
 To him that seems as in her dreams, unbroken by the storm on the sea 
 But quiet deep and warm ever free, to give his love away 
 And when these two have found the land, the world is not the same 
 For though it spins when love begins, the world is not the same 
 This is one change I always have longed for 
 I always belonged more to you than to anyone 
 And in your hand the stars the sand, the rain and wind are new, as we live 
 And learn what love can do, when we give all our love away 
 And now we too have found the land, the world is not the same 
 For though it spins when love begins, the world is not... the... sameEvery night I hope and pray 
 A dream lover will come my way 
 A girl to hold in my arms 
 And know the magic of her charms 
 'Cause I want 
 A girl 
 To call 
 My own 
 I want a dream lover 
 So I don't have to dream alone 
 Dream lover, where are you 
 With a love, oh, so true 
 And the hand that I can hold 
 To feel you near as I grow old 
 'Cause I want 
 A girl 
 To call 
 My own 
 I want a dream lover 
 So I don't have to dream alone 
 Someday, I don't know how 
 I hope she'll hear my plea 
 Some way, I don't know how 
 She'll bring her love to me 
 Dream lover, until then 
 I'll go to sleep and dream again 
 That's the only thing to do 
 Till all my lover's dreams come true 
 'Cause I want 
 A girl 
 To call 
 My own 
 I want a dream lover 
 So I don't have to dream alone 
 Dream lover, until then 
 I'll go to sleep and dream again 
 That's the only thing to do 
 Till all my lover's dreams come true 
 'Cause I want 
 A girl 
 To call 
 My own 
 I want a dream lover 
 So I don't have to dream alone 
 Please don't make me dream alone 
 I beg you don't make me dream alone 
 No, I don't wanna dreamWhy do I do just as you say? 
 Why must I just give you your way? 
 Why do I sigh? 
 Why do I try to forget? 
 It must have been that something lovers call "Fate" 
 Kept on saying I had to wait 
 I saw them all 
 Just couldn't fall till we met 
 It had to be you, it had to be you 
 I wandered around and finally found the somebody who 
 Could make me be true, could make me be blue 
 And even be glad just to be sad thinkin' of you 
 Some others I've seen might never be mean 
 Might never be cross or try to be boss, but they wouldn't do 
 For nobody else gave me a thrill 
 With all your faults, I love you still 
 It had to be you, wonderful you, it had to be youI got a color TV for a limited time. 
 And you can have it by tonight, it'll bend your mind. 
 I wouldn't just sell it to an ordinary fool, 
 Y' have to be sure that the fool has cool. 
 Since you look like a man with heart and soul. 
 If you buy it from me now, you get a free mixing bowl. 
 I'll even let you have a little button I' got 
 That says have a nice day, you're gonna like it a lot. 
 Popular music is the national craze. 
 Rock and Roll stars have the kids in a daze. 
 But twist the knob around for a different point of view 
 And you'll twist that knob till it comes unscrewed. 
 There's only one song that the TV sings and that's 
 Pennies From Heaven, while the register rings. 
 So it's easy to see, right from the start 
 That what makes good money, makes good art. 
 Now did you read the encyclical that's written by the Pope 
 Sayin' folks with private property just got no hope. 
 The rich ain't welcome in the heavenly Palladium, 
 But the Knights of Columbus own Yankee Stadium. 
 Now I ain't sayin' that the Pope was wrong 
 But he can easily afford to sing that song. 
 If you'd like to call him up when you need some dough, 
 His number's Et Cum Spiri 2 2 0 
 The kids that fought the war are livin' outa state 
 And the CIA is runnin' things of late. 
 When we elect a man, we put him on the spot, 
 'Cause if he don't play ball, he might get shot. 
 The national security keeps it from the voters, 
 'Cause what's good for America isn't good for General Motors. 
 We went and found ourselves some mighty strange lovers. 
 The kind that like to blow from underneath the covers. 
 Well millions can avoid with Dr Sigmund Freud 
 Those realities of life that tend to make me paranoid. 
 Lookin' for the answer just gives me indigestion 
 I spent so much time, just dealin' with the question. 
 We'd rather talk of dollars and forget about events 
 When what we have to decide is; Does it all make sense? 
 Well everybody's happy, I saw it on the news, 
 But me, I' got a case of color TV blues. 
 You know, just 'cause you're paranoid 
 Doesn't mean they're not trying t' get ya'The angels are lost in the city of stars 
 The wise men are down on their knees 
 And the fruitman of freeway will sell you his cars 
 When he's sure that you can't find the keys 
 And the ladies on Magdalene lane 
 All worship the sun and the sand 
 And the migrants who come can't complain 
 For this is their promised land 
 MGM studios can't make the nut 
 They're auctioning Dorothy's shoes 
 Gable is gone, the Good Witch is a slut 
 And I've got the parking lot blues 
 The wizard brought Benzedrine smiles 
 And he never let Dorothy doze 
 She died as she walked down the aisle 
 And all that remains is her clothes 
 Over the rainbow, a Kansas tornado 
 Can twist up a little girl's head 
 Aunt Em's on relief and the Tinman's a thief 
 And even The Wizard can't wake the dead 
 The prophet has come to the kingdom of lights 
 But there's no one to listen or learn 
 And the savior performs for the prophet's delight 
 While dissenters are banished or burned 
 And the heretics beg to be heard 
 But the savior's on tour for the week 
 Salvation is found in his word 
 If only he'd learn how to speak 
 And Lincoln is laughing with Amos 'n' Andy 
 Concerning the Great Civil War 
 And Paul Revere sleeps with the worst looking creeps 
 While revolution's knockin' at his door 
 Magdalene Lane is the red light domain 
 Where everyone's soul is for sale 
 A piece of your heart will do for a start 
 And you can send us the rest in the mail 
 For we have our own families to feed 
 And we can't let them starve just for you 
 But, we'd rather not watch while you bleed 
 So come back in an hour when you're through 
 It's just another city full of sorrow 
 Makes no difference why I came 
 And I only know I'm leaving here tomorrow 
 And only the motel man knows my nameDid you know that love can grow any place where people go, 
 And I can tell by what I see that you have found a place with me. 
 The sun is high the day is new and 
 I have found a place with you. 
 Ev'ry place and ev'ry face casts a spell and leaves a trace, 
 With you in mind and with you near, the myth is gone, the past is clear 
 And here with scars of now and then so you and I begin again. 
 Did you know I've been searchin'? Did you know I've been blind? 
 Did you know I've been touchin' anything I could find? 
 Did you know that here below, moving where my feelings flow, 
 You live with me in time that's new, suspended in a love that's true 
 And far beyond the fatal noise and bathed in all life's simple joys. 
 Did you know that love can grow any place where people go, 
 And I can tell by what I see that you have found a place with me.I wish my brain would operate instead of standing still, it's all so complicated. 
 The thread of my own thoughts is disappearing to what seems to be a logical conclusion, I guess I've run out of ideas. 
 I've heard a million songs about this and that and it gave me satisfaction. 
 But I see, it's a beautiful life 
 Now comes the second verse and I have to at least keep the measure straight 
 It's been a long time and I'm really insecure about it all, I guess I didn't like seeing the things I saw. 
 Who needs it? 
 It's been a little painful, and I hope I don't like pain, 'cause I'd hate to think of myself like that. 
 'Cause I see, it's a beautiful life 
 How did I ever let some of those ideas out of the box? 
 It was just a feeling I had, and I liked the verses, they were so nice and even. 
 My eye will never be that good again. 
 I lost a certain sense of rhythm, but I gained a certain sense of time. 
 'Cause I see, it's a beautiful life 
 I like the old things, but I can't give up the idea of trying something just a little bit different, even if it's stupid. 
 'Cause I see, it's a beautiful life 
 Yes I see, it's a beautiful life 
 And I see, it's a beautiful lifeToyland, toyland 
 Little girl and boy land 
 When you dwell within it 
 You are ever happy there! 
 Childhood toyland 
 Mystical merry toyland 
 Once you pass it's borders 
 You can never return again! (not again!) 
 Childhood toyland (Toyland!) 
 Mystical merry toyland 
 Once you pass it's borders 
 You can never return again! 
 (Toyland!) Toyland (Toyland!) Toyland 
 (Toyland!) Toyland!The lonesome sound of a train going by 
 Makes me wanna stop and cry 
 I recall the day it took you away 
 I'm blue, I'm lonesome too 
 Well, when I hear that whistle blow 
 I want to pack my suitcase and go 
 The lonesome sound of a train going by 
 Makes me want to stop and cry 
 In the still of night, in the pale moonlight 
 The wind it moans and sighs 
 These aw-felt blues, I just can't lose 
 I'm blue, I'm lonesome too 
 Well, when I hear that lonesome whistle blow 
 I want to pack my suitcase and go 
 The lonesome sound of a train going by 
 Makes me want to stop and cry 
 I'm blue, I'm lonesome tooStarry, starry night 
 Paint your palette blue and gray 
 Look out on a summer's day 
 With eyes that know the darkness in my soul 
 Shadows on the hills 
 Sketch the trees and the daffodils 
 Catch the breeze and the winter chills 
 In colors on the snowy linen land 
 Now I understand 
 What you tried to say to me 
 And how you suffered for your sanity 
 And how you tried to set them free 
 They would not listen, they did not know how 
 Perhaps they'll listen now 
 Starry, starry night 
 Flaming flowers that brightly blaze 
 Swirling clouds in violet haze 
 Reflect in Vincent's eyes of china blue 
 Colors changing hue 
 Morning fields of amber grain 
 Weathered faces lined in pain 
 Are soothed beneath the artist's loving hand 
 Now I understand 
 What you tried to say to me 
 And how you suffered for your sanity 
 And how you tried to set them free 
 They would not listen, they did not know how 
 Perhaps they'll listen now 
 For they could not love you 
 But still your love was true 
 And when no hope was left in sight 
 On that starry, starry night 
 You took your life, as lovers often do 
 But I could've told you, Vincent 
 This world was never meant for 
 One as beautiful as you 
 Starry, starry night 
 Portraits hung in empty halls 
 Frameless heads on nameless walls 
 With eyes that watch the world and can't forget 
 Like the strangers that you've met 
 The ragged men in ragged clothes 
 The silver thorn of bloody rose 
 Lie crushed and broken on the virgin snow 
 Now I think I know 
 What you tried to say to me 
 And how you suffered for your sanity 
 And how you tried to set them free 
 They would not listen, they're not listening still 
 Perhaps they never willIf you want to make me happy, here is all you gotta do 
 Take me where you're going and I'll take care of you 
 'Cause I got this need that's growing to keep you satisfied 
 And if you keep your green light showing well you can take me for a ride 
 'Cause I la la la la la la love you, 
 And I la la la la la la care. 
 And I really want you with me baby everywhere 
 Well, I like the way you're moving, and I like a the way you go 
 I like the way you let your locomotion show 
 'Cause my drivin' wheel is drivin' and my piston's working good 
 And if your motor gives you some trouble baby, 
 I'll take a look underneath your hood (yes, I would) 
 Well, I know you like your transportation with a motor and a rubber wheel, 
 But when you move you cause a transformation in this lover and the way I feel 
 So if you want to make me happy here is all you gotta do 
 Just let me ride your boxcar and I'll hobo with you 
 'Cause all I got is on my shoulder, I'm walkin' on my trav'lin' shoes 
 And before I get much older I'm gonna kick these lovesick blues 
 Yes, I la la la la la la love you, 
 And I la la la la la la care. 
 'Cause II don't have plans and schemes, and I don't have hopes and dreams 
 I don't have anything since I don't have you 
 I don't have fond desires; I don't have happy hours 
 I don't have anything since I don't have you 
 I don't have happiness, and I guess I never will again 
 When you walked out on me in came old misery, 
 And he's been here since then 
 Now I don't have love to share, and I don't have one who cares 
 I don't have anything since I don't have ... 
 You, you, you, you, youTimber, timber, timber, 
 Timber, timber, timber. 
 Oh, the mountains high, down the canyons wide 
 Let me roam and ride, ride through timber 
 When the day is done, by the campfire's gleam 
 Let me lie and dream, dream of timber. 
 Tall timber's callin', and the echoes ring 
 All nature sings a song along the timber trail 
 Blue shadows fallin', down the canyon's vale 
 And the whispering pines entwine along the timber trail. 
 High in the sky above 
 The love song of the trees 
 Will blend and wend its way 
 Out on the breeze. 
 Tall timber's callin', and the echoes ring 
 All nature sings a song along the timber trail. 
 High in the sky above 
 The love song of the trees 
 Will blend and wend its way 
 Out on the breeze. 
 Tall timber's callin', and the echoes ring 
 All nature sings a song along the timber trail 
 Blue shadows fallin', down the canyon's vale 
 And the whispering pines entwine along the timber trail. 
 The timber trail, timber, timber, 
 Timber, timber, timber, timber.It started out quite simply, as complex things can do; 
 A set of sad transparencies till no one could see through, 
 But least of all the one inside, behind the iron glass; 
 A prisonor of all your dreams that never come to pass. 
 Alone you stand corrupted by the vision that you sought, 
 And blinded by your hunger all your apetites are bought, 
 But in spite of what becomes of you, your image will remain; 
 A reminder of your constant loss, a symbol of your gain. 
 And your friends are together, 
 Where the people are all gathered, 
 All along the road you travelled all your days. 
 And soon you have succumbed to what the others all believe, 
 And though the lie affects them still it's you that they deceive, 
 And all at once you're lost within the emptieness of you, 
 And there's no one left who's near enough to tell you what to do. 
 You're left with nothing but your self-potential in the dark, 
 Like tinder resting on a rock, protected from the spark, 
 But your fire just consumes you, you alone can feel the pain, 
 And you stand in all your glory and you know you can't complain. 
 And your friends are together, 
 Where the people are all gathered, 
 All along the road you travelled all your days. 
 But you are surely just as evil as the worst my tongue can tell, 
 For you'll never face my heaven and I'll not endure your hell. 
 You have lost your chance to mingle with your constant quiet lies; 
 Deceptions hidden with your lips, but spoken with your eyes. 
 For I know you for what you are not for that's really all you are. 
 And your talents of a minor order seem to stretch too far. 
 And we both know that this masquerade can't carry on too long. 
 You're deep inside the Pride Parade, but where do you belong? 
 And your friends are together, 
 Where the people are all gathered, 
 All along the road you travelled all your days.Love me, oh love me 
 Love me like nobody else can do 
 Need me 
 And just let me go one needing you 
 Well if you want to try to make me over 
 And there's something else that fits your plan 
 It's all right if you would only tell me 
 What it's going to take to be your man 
 If you ever say you're going to leave me 
 Lord I don't know what on earth I'll do 
 I could never face a new tomorrow 
 If I had to face it without you 
 And just let me go on needing you.As the seasons go circlin', and the years spin away 
 And the highway grows narrow, at the end of the day 
 There's a promise I made you, on the first day of spring 
 To have and to hold, this gold wedding ring 
 To have and to hold, till death do us part 
 In sickness or health, with all the love in my heart 
 For richer, for poorer, till we both have grown old 
 Through all of life's seasons, to have and to hold 
 And if we can have children, or live all alone 
 The light of our love, will forever be shown 
 Our union is timeless, our love beyond worth 
 To have and to hold, till the ends of the earth 
 To have and to hold, till death do us part 
 In sickness or health, with all the love in my heart 
 For richer, for poorer, till we both have grown old 
 Through all of life's seasons, to have and to hold 
 Through all of life's seasons, to have and to holdIt came upon a midnight clear that glorious song of old 
 From angels bending near the earth to touch their harps of gold 
 Peace on the earth goodwill to men from heav'n all gracious King 
 The world in solemn stillness lay to hear the angels sing 
 For lo the days are hast'ning on by prophets seen of old 
 When with the ever circling years shall come the time foretold 
 When the new heav'n and earth shall on the Prince of peace their king 
 And the whole world send back the song which now the angels singI'm building my body 
 I'm happy when I'm building my body 
 I'm tired of fighting, let's make friends 
 I'm tired of burning both ends 
 That's why I'm building my body 
 It hurts me but I'm building my body 
 And I know what the pain is worth 
 I know I feel the pain of birth 
 I'm pushin' up 
 And gettin' down with my body 
 There's no-one else around with my body 
 One look says I'm a stone disgrace 
 Don't kick no sand in my face 
 Because I'm building my body strong 
 I'm watching what I eat 
 And I'm sorting out right from wrong 
 Hey, not a lot of meat 
 And I know that it won't be long 
 Before I gotta quit smoking 
 Because I'm building my body 
 I'm peaceful when I'm building my body 
 I'm sweating out mistakes I've made 
 I'm getting back the dues I've paid 
 I'm doing more 
 And getting sore with my body 
 But I'm gaining a rapport with my body 
 And this seems like the perfect time 
 They say I'm in my prime 
 That's why I'm building my body strong 
 I'm thinking at the table 
 And I'm sorting out right from wrong 
 I'm reading every label 
 And I know that it won't be long 
 Before I gotta quit smoking 
 'Cause I'm building my body 
 There's someone else inside of my body 
 He's waiting to be born againThe winter season of the year, 
 When to this world our Lord was born, 
 The ox and donkey, so they say, 
 Did keep his holy presence warm. 
 How many oxen and donkeys now 
 If they were there when first he came, 
 How many oxen and donkeys you know 
 At such a time would do the same? 
 And on that night it has been told 
 These humble beasts so rough and rude, 
 Throughout the noght of holy birth 
 Drank no water, ate no food. 
 How many oxen and donkeys now 
 If they were there when first he came, 
 How many oxen and donkeys you know 
 At such a time would do the same? 
 As soon as to these humble beasts 
 Appeared our Lord, so mild and sweet, 
 With joy they knelt before his Grace 
 And gently kissed His tiny feet. 
 How many oxen and donkeys now 
 Dressed in ermine, silk and such, 
 How many oxen and donkeys you know 
 At such a time would do as much?You took me up to Heaven 
 When you took me in your arms 
 I was dazzled by your beauty 
 Blinded by your charms 
 I was lost in a fool's paradise 
 Good and lost in a fool's paradise 
 Now when you told me that you loved me 
 Well, then I gave my heart to you 
 Oh, well, I wonder if there could be 
 Any truth in love so new 
 I was lost in a fool's paradise 
 Good and lost in a fool's paradise 
 The whole world was my kingdom 
 And your love the gem in my crown 
 But when I saw you glance at a new romance 
 You know my love came tumbling down 
 Well, you treat me kinda coolish 
 And you never let me know 
 That you think I'm being foolish 
 And because I love you so 
 I still get lost in a fool's paradise 
 Good and lost in a fool's paradise 
 Well, the whole world was my kingdom 
 And your love the gem in my crown 
 But when I saw you glance at a new romance 
 You know my love came tumbling down 
 You know, you treat me kinda coolish 
 And you never let me know 
 That you think I'm being foolish 
 Because I love you so 
 I still get lost in a fool's paradise 
 Lost with you in a fool's paradise 
 Yes, I still get lost in a fool's paradise 
 So god-darn lost in a fool's paradiseOn the first floor 
 On the first floor 
 On the first floor there's a young girl reeling 
 Her body's numb and without feeling 
 As illusions dance on the midnight ceiling 
 Now she's falling, now she's kneeling 
 It's almost like she's bowed in prayer 
 A savior she's about to bear 
 She screams for help, but no one's there 
 On the first floor 
 On the first floor people walk the halls 
 But none can hear her desperate calls 
 There is no sound beyond the walls 
 So to the telephone she crawls 
 She telephones her only friend 
 The one on whom she can depend 
 But the phone rings on without an end 
 Then rings no more 
 On the first floor 
 There's a party on the second floor 
 And through the picture window you can see them all 
 They're laughing and they're dancing 
 Admiring the Renoir that's hanging on the wall 
 But in the master bedroom where the coats are piled high 
 A silent, saddened lady thinks of what it's like to die 
 And as she dwells on all the years she still has left to face 
 She wonders how she'll ever find someone to take his place 
 Then suddenly she's jarred by the ringing of the phone 
 Oh, why do you ring now, just when I want to be alone? 
 So she walks into the bathroom and drinks some water from a cup 
 But the telephone stops ringing just before she picks it up 
 My family was very poor 
 So I worked hard to be secure 
 I married one I had to wed 
 And not the one I loved instead 
 When I was young my blood ran wild 
 But we stayed married for the child 
 Now three flights up, I'm all alone 
 My wife is dead, my child is grown 
 My daughter leads a wayward life 
 She's been a failure as a wife 
 And though she lives just one floor down 
 She never calls or comes around 
 Step off the platform and onto the train 
 Look out your window and into the rain 
 Watch all the buildings that pass as you ride 
 And count all the stories that go on inside 
 And then ask yourself if it must be this way 
 Should walls and doors and plaster ceilings 
 Separate us from each others' feelings?And I love you so, 
 The people ask me how, 
 How I've lived till now 
 I tell them "I don't know" 
 I guess they understand 
 How lonely life has been 
 But life began again 
 The day you took my hand 
 And yes I know how lonely life can be 
 The shadows follow me 
 And the night won't set me free 
 But I don't let the evening get me down 
 Now that you're around me 
 And you love me too 
 Your thoughts are just for me 
 You set my spirit free 
 I'm happy that you do 
 The book of life is brief 
 And once a page is read 
 All but love is dead 
 That is my belief 
 And yes I know how loveless life can be 
 The shadows follow me 
 And the night won't set me free 
 But I don't let the evening bring me down 
 Now that you're around me 
 And I love you so 
 The people ask me how, 
 How I've lived till now 
 I tell them "I don't know"I hate fashion, I hate it with a passion 
 Are you a fashion victim? Are you a fashion victim? 
 Are you a fashion victim? I bet you are 
 I see them on the video, they're wearin' fashion shoes 
 They're singin' 'bout their troubles, they never paid their dues 
 The rhythm's in the background, the fashion's in the front 
 They tricked us out of music with this latest fashion stunt 
 I hate fashion, I hate it with a passion 
 Are you a fashion victim? Are you a fashion victim? 
 Are you a fashion victim? I bet you are 
 The candidate is handsome, he's wearin' tailored clothes 
 He's following the pollster everywhere he goes 
 His teeth have all been straightened, his hair is very full 
 His stupidity is hidden by this image-making bull 
 I hate fashion, I hate it with a passion 
 Are you a fashion victim? Are you a fashion victim? 
 Are you a fashion victim? I bet you are 
 School is just a showcase where fashion children go 
 As long as they look cool, there's little they should know 
 Ideas have no power when people cannot read 
 Fashion can go sour, it's not cool to be in need 
 I hate fashion, I hate it with a passion 
 Are you a fashion victim? Are you a fashion victim? 
 Are you a fashion victim? I bet you are 
 How did the land of Jefferson, how did the land of King 
 Become the land of hamburgers and raisins that can sing? 
 Roosevelt was cripple, Lincoln was a geek 
 They'd never get elected, their clothes were never chic 
 I hate fashion, I hate it with a passion 
 Are you a fashion victim? Are you a fashion victim? 
 Are you a fashion victim? I bet you areI've got nothing on my mind, 
 Nothing to remember, 
 Nothing to forget. 
 And I've got nothing to regret. 
 But I'm all tied up on the inside, 
 No one knows quite what I've got, 
 And I know that on the outside 
 What I used to be 
 I'm not 
 Anymore. 
 You know I've heard about people like me 
 But I never made the connection. 
 They walk one road to set them free 
 And find they've gone the wrong direction. 
 But there's no need for turning back 
 Cause all roads lead to where I stand; 
 And I believe I'll walk them all 
 No matter what I may have planned. 
 Can you remember who I was? 
 Can you still feel it? 
 Can you find my pain? 
 Can you heal it? 
 Then lay your hands upon me now 
 And cast this darkness from my soul. 
 You alone can light my way. 
 You alone can make me whole 
 Once again. 
 We've walked both sides of every street 
 Through all kinds of windy weather; 
 But that was never our defeat 
 As long as we could walk together. 
 So there's no need for turning back 
 Cause all roads lead to where we stand; 
 And I believe we'll walk them all 
 No matter what we may have planned.